Authors
Brandon Herring
Number of Reviews
65

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Rated R: strong sexual content, nudity, language, drug content, comic violence,
crude humor.
Starring: Breckin Meyer, Seann William Scott, Tom Green, Rachel Blanchard, Fred
Ward, Amy Smart, DJ Qualls, Anthony Rapp, Paulo Costanzo, Andy Dick
Directed by: Todd Phillips
Teen comedies were abundant in 1999, we had "She's All That", "Never Been
Kissed", "10 Things I Hate About You" and so many more....they were good
movies, but the bad things were the PG-13 ratings. I mean a teen's life is not
PG-13 and in 2000 we've had already three PG-13 teen movies, and they will
continue. In July of 1999, a raunchy NC-17 rated film that was all about teens
started to buzz, and was finally cut down to an R and released into theatres.
The film was what a real teens life was all about, no proms (well no good
proms) and no love stories, the film was "American Pie" a classic for the 90's.
It was a straight teen film, and it was a huge hit, which will definately spawn
a ton of copies. The first being the unbelievably funny "Road Trip" a new R
rated teen comedy that comes just at the right time when we are getting tired
or PG-13 teen movies.
Breckin Meyer plays Josh, a student at the University of Ithica in New York.
Josh and his girlfriend are at seperate colleges, but he is bent on staying
faithful, until her roomate tells him that she doesn't want him anymore. His
girlfriend is Tiffany played by the ever so beautiful Rachel Blanchard. Josh
meets Beth (Amy Smart) and the two go to a party, get drunk and make a sex tape
together, only to have his friend Rubin accidentally sends it to Tiffany,
causing Josh, Rubin, E.L. (played hilariously by Seann William Scott) and Kyle
(DJ Qualls) to have to go on a road trip across the country to retrieve the
tape. On the way there they encounter several misadventures that are gut
bustingly funny!
"Road Trip" is smartly written, very well directed, and the cast is having some
fun in their roles. To note Breckin Meyer is a great actor. He is funny, smart
and he fills the screen without getting on our nerves or hoping he was gone.
Seann William Scott was classic in "American Pie" as the sex-luvin Stiffler,
who in the end got what he deserved. Paulo Costanzo is a very talented actor
and fits the role of Rubin quite well, and DJ Qualls is irreplaceable as the
skinny Kyle, who seems to like people not his size.
Even though I didn't think "Road Trip" was as good as "American Pie" it was a
still a fantastic film. At times I almost choked to death from laughing so
hard. Some of you may say will most of this has been done yada yada yada, well
actually yeah it has, but some of these jokes are just so put well that we
forgive their unorginality. The cast is incredinly lovable and seems to be
having great fun with their roles, and Tom Green is just great as Barry the
overaged college student who at the beginning and end of the film is giving a
tour of the school.
I thoroughly enjoyed "Road Trip" it has a few flaws here and there, but its
raunchy and funny, and in the end a sweet love story that we actually get
involved in. Maybe we will get more R rated teen comedies, that actually show
how a teen's life is. A teen's life isnt PG-13 its definately NC-17 or X. I
can't wait now for American Pie 2 next year. Go see "Road Trip"  I guaratee
it's going to be one of the funnest times at the movies in the year 2000.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring Mary 19, 2000.
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Rating: * * * * out of * * * *  
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Olivia Williams, Toni Collete.
Rated PG-13 for intense thematic elements and violent images.
Not one movie I have seen in my life, has made me feel the way I felt when I
saw the newest classic 'The Sixth Sense'. A strikingly original movie that at
first glance seems like a horror film with many chills, turns into a
unexpectedly movie drama with a surprising ending. The acting in the film was
incredible especially by young Osment who gives one of the best performances of
the year. Bruce Willis is perfectly cast, as well as Toni Collete and Olivia
Williams. 
Haley Joel Osment plays Cole a young, smart boy plagued by images of dead
people still walking around. No one knows his secret but him, and he is
destined not to tell anyone. When child psychiatrist Malcolm (Bruce Willis)
finds out about the boy, he wants to help him. Naturally Cole is afraid and
scared to tell anyone even his mother played by Toni Collete. He and Malcolm
become good friends and Cole finally tells him about his 'sixth sense' and
seeing dead people. Although Malcolm's personal life with his wife becomes on
the rocks, he still tries to help the young boy and see what the illness is. At
first he doesn't believe him and thinks Cole is having visual hallucinations,
but after he thinks about what happened a year before he starts to believe Cole
leading to an ending that's not only shocking but very moving.
A different movie experience all together. With disturbing images of ghosts
walking around and terrorizing young Cole, it is extremely scary sometimes, but
most of the time it's a psychological drama that stems from the acting it has
in it, and the direction it was made with. Haley Joel Osment is excellent as
the young boy, and deserves all the credit he can get in this role that should
make him famous. His images of ghosts are not only believable but will give you
a new outlook on what ghosts are and what they are doing here. Bruce Willis
gives one of his most endearing and believable performances to date, who with
Osment make a great on-screen duo.
Toni Collete as Cole's mother gives a wonderful female performance and deserves
as well all the credit she can get. Olivia Williams who was so good in
'Rushmore' also gives a great performance. Being written and directed by M.
Night Shyamalan, this is a pure work of genius, nothing more nothing less. A
movie like this deserves to be nominated for a Best Picture Oscar as well as
Screenplay and acting. 
When you see this one, be sure to listen and understand it completely. It's not
a horror movie it's a sad, drama really with some scary parts. It means alot to
some people, it got down somewhere in me that no other movie before has. To put
it another way 'The Sixth Sense' is one of the best movie of this year.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring September 16, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest (1975)
First thing's first, while I watched this movie, I found myself stunned. This
movie so entertained the viewer, as it did fascinate, and inform. A chilling,
disturbing, and revealing look into the mental institutions as seen through the
eyes of a con. Jack Nicholson, Louise Fletcher, Brad Dourif, Danny DeVito, and
Christopher Lloyd, round out the excellent, and very well casted cast.
Jack Nicholson brilliantly plays Randall Patrick McMurphy, an ex-con, who fakes
being mentally insane, to enter the institution. As he goes to the hospital, he
doesn't realize, that the people, and the atmosphere there is so out there. The
patients are really psycho, and creepy. Randall, must try and survive these
days, before he has to go to Jail. He has to entertain himself while at the
same time, find good in this place of craziness.
Lousie Fletcher plays Nurse Ratched, a soft; but strong willed nurse, who will
not take anything from anyone, or put up with misbehavior. She watches Randall,
and notices something different about him, hes not as psycho as the others, but
he is a little out there. Her job is touch indeed, having to put up with all
these men, who dont listen, some go crazy and throw fits, and others just sit
there and dont do anything.
Randall meets many new friends in this place, Brad Dourif who plays Billy
Bibbit, is a mentally unstable, but voluntarily institutionalized person. Danny
DeVito plays Martini, a slow but charming and sweet man, who means know harm in
what he does or say. Christopher Lloyd plays Taber, a man, who also voluntarily
institutionalized himself. He also meets Chief, a big 'dumb, and deaf' Indian,
who happens to like to play basketball.
Randall must try and survive these days with his new friends, and the hospital,
as well as an everlasting war as to which they can watch the world series on
TV. Put up with Nurse Ratched, and the other patients, doctors, vistors, and
nurses. Ultimately leading up to a dramatic finale, that makes you want to
stand up and cheer.
I think what was best about this film was the realism. I had no problem
believing that this was happening. Almost like a documentary, it was striking
and powerful, making the viewer not want to stop watching till the end. Some of
the sequences are memorable as the basketball game, and the fishing trip. Jack
Nicholson, who as always plays his character absolutely excellent, and makes
the viewer want hand him an Oscar himself. 
The supporting cast, Louise Fletcher, Danny DeVito, Christopher Lloyd, and Brad
Dourif also give terrific performances. Danny, Christopher, and Brad's careers
all were made with this superb movie. It's all sentimental, funny, dramatic,
intense, chilling, disturbing, diverting, and tragic. The finale leaves the
viewer stunned and sitting there thinking about what he just saw. See this
film, and believe it. I think you will find, its one of the BEST ever. 
The second film to win all five major Oscars: Best Picture, Best Actor
(Nicholson), Best Actress (Fletcher), Director, and Screenplay. And it deserved
all of them.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring (HorrorMvFn@aol.com)

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)

American Psycho * * *1/2 out of * * * *
Starring: Christian Bale, Reese Witherspoon, Chloe Sevingy, Willem Defoe,
Jarod Leto, Samantha Mathis.
Directed by: Mary Harron
Rated R: some graphic violence and gore, strong sexuality, nudity, language
and drug use.
Running Time: 101 Minutes
Controversy is one of my favorite words in the dictionary, because when
controversy and movies are mentioned in the same sentence, its a good bet
that the movie will either be a huge hit, or a huge flop. "American Psycho"
opened to great critical acceptation, but failed to make it big at the box
office, after a few months it had faded away, but those lucky people who saw
the movie were shocked, offended, and amazed by this movie.
Patrick Batemen is not your typical business man, he is a handsome, well
built man who keeps his body in shape, and takes care of his body. In the
opening five minutes we learn how Patrick does this, by applying exfoliating
lotions, soaps, etc. But Patrick has a downside to him, he is a psychotic
killer, who likes to slice and dice women and kill men.
Of course Patrick's colleagues and friends don't know this, and neither does
his fiance played by Reese Witherspoon. After an acquaintance of Patrick's
ends up dead Patrick is questioned in the murder of this man, of course we
know Patrick did it...why? Because we see Patrick chop this man up with an
Ax. From here on, the movie is a study of Patrick's life, as he finds out who
he really is...
Christian Bale takes over the difficult role of Patrick Bateman, and let me
be the first one to say this may be the best male leading role I've seen in
the year 2000. His dialogue comes out of his mouth with such greatness, and
I think Christian started to really get into the role. With the scenes of
graphic violence, he seems to use them in a skillful way, and Mary Harron's
direction doesn't make it as gratuitous as one might think.
Next to Christian Bales the performances from Reese Witherspoon as Patrick's
annoying yet lovable fiance is quite funny, and she seems to be enjoying
herself on screen, and the audience is enjoying themselves watching her.
Willem Defoe as Detective Kimbell is good, but his character seems to me to
be underdeveloped. The standout of the supporting cast is Chloe Sevingy who
last year gave a fantastic performance in Boys Don't Cry, one of my picks for
best picture last year.
"American Psycho's" biggest flaw is the last 15 minutes, in which it makes
little sense, and starts to take itself seriously, with talks of a sequel in
the works, I will definitely be first in line to see it, as long as the
original cast returns. "American Psycho" is a great film that I recommend to
anyone who enjoys watching messed up movies that are brilliant.

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
Starring: Geena Davis, Hugh Laurie, Jonathan Lipnicki, Michal J. Fox (Voice),
Jennifer Tilly (Voice), Nathan Lane (Voice), Dabney Coleman, Estelle Getty.
"Stuart Little" is one of the best family films to come out this year. It's a
cute, funny and very good-natured film that has nothing for parents to squirm
over except a few mild cusswords. Though I read the book a long time ago and I
really do not remember what it was about, I do know that this film does not
disappoint. Finally a movie gets released that is as good as the trailer makes
it to be, with a few surprising twists, some very funny moments, and a few
sentimental moments all mixed in to one great little movie.
Stuart Little is a mouse. He has finally gotten a new home after being put up
for adoption, he now lives with the Littles. A nice little (no pun intended)
family that lives in their apartment next to Central Park in New York City.
They have a little boy George (played by the adorable Jonathan Lipnicki) and
now they have a new son. At first Stuart takes a while but he finally adjusts
to being part of the family and even getting along with the pet cat. 
George doesn't take too well to having a mouse for a brother at first, but once
the two play together they instantly bond. Stuart however is missing something,
and he wants to know who his real parents are. The Littles try and find his
parents and one day they show up on the doorstep wanting Stuart back.
Hesitating the Littles know what's best for Stuart and so does Snowball the pet
cat, he and his friends try to get Stuart but in the end we find out the truth
about Stuart's past ending up to a sentimental and very heart-warming ending.
One thing I noticed about the film instantly was the fantastic special effects.
Just like in "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom Menace" Stuart Little and his
family are all computer generated and they look fantastically real. From the
detail of their fur, to the detail of the way the walk; the special effects
team put a lot of time and effort on this $90 million dollar film and it shows.
Another movie that this has in common with is "Babe" with it's talking animals
and people understanding them. It has a family friendly atmosphere and is never
really scary or suspenseful enough to even scare the youngest of kids.
Michael J. Fox does the voice of Stuart himself and just like in the "Homeward
Bound" movies does a fantastic job and brings more out of Stuart than anyone
else could. He to me fits the character perfectly and ends up making Stuart
even more lovable. Another gem of the film is Nathan Lane as Snowball. When he
was Timon in 1994's "The Lion King" I would have sworn he was a comedian, and
now in "Stuart Little" he brings the most out of Snowball and makes him one of
those characters we love to dislike.
For the human actors Geena Davis who never gives a bad performance does not
disappoint here as well. She fits nicely in her character and there is a good
chemistry between her and Hugh Laurie who plays Mr. Little. Both make us
believe they are happily in love and married and Jonathan Lipnicki as their
song is even more adorable than he was in 1996's "Jerry Maguire". Even though
Stuart Little is completely CGI, the human characters and Stuart have a nice
chemistry together and even makes us believe they really do care for each
other.
"Stuart Little" is ideal family entertainment for this holiday season and will
not disappoint youngsters or adults for that matter. We get entertainment,
laughs, cries and more fun at the movies this season than probably any other
movie. Its nice to see a PG rated movie out at Christmas that everyone can see.
Even though it has a $90 million dollar budget I'm sure it will make over that
or just below it respectively. For all you parents out there trying to find a
good family movie, I have yet to see Bicentennial man as I write this but as
far as I know "Stuart Little" and "Toy Story 2" are by far the best family
films this year. A Winner. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring December 15, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
Starring: Keanu Reeves, James Spader, Marisa Tomei.
When I first saw the previews for Joe Charbonic's new serial killer thriller, 
I thought "Hey maybe Keanu might come out with a somewhat decent movie". I 
was somewhat disappointed with "The Matrix" though I liked it never-the-less. 
I went into "The Watcher" expecting a somewhat good serial killer flick and 
walked out with a headache, some confusion and wondering why they wanted to 
make this movie in the first place. I may be the only one to give this movie 
this low of a rating, but when you have to sit through a movie, checking your 
watch every five minutes to see if it is over yet, then it is definately bad 
to me.
James Spader plays a detective who has been haunted from memories of his 
past. A killer has been following him trying to latch on to him, after he did 
something horrible to his girlfriend. He has a therapist (Marisa Tomei) who 
is trying to help him through all this trauma he is going through. Now the 
killer (Keanu Reeves) is sending him pictures of the girls he is going to 
kill, and Spader has one day to try to find them before its too late. Now all 
of New York City has to strap down and try to find these girls before the 
body count becomes bigger.
Jumbled plot? Bad writing? Sloppy Direction? Flat Acting? Thats pretty much 
what all this movie has in it. First of all the plot, if that is what you 
want me to call it, is so underdeveloped that is painfully confusing and so 
predictable that by the end of the movie I leaned over to my girlfriend and 
said "Let's go". I wasn't going to be insulted anymore, but she insisted on 
staying saying it has to be good somewhere somehow. Of course when I left the 
theatre she thought it was good, while I thought the opposite. I had to 
wonder why Keanu Reeves a somewhat talented actor chose such a terrible role 
as a serial killer, who isn't believable as a serial killer, nor does he fit 
the serial killer role.
James Spader has never been someone in Hollyweird I have liked, and in "The 
Watcher" he doesn't prove to me he can really be anyone I will like, after 
starring in the huge flop earlier this year "Supernova" he really hasn't had 
much in the way of a job. His character is completely and utterly 
underdeveloped and we know nothing about him to like or dislike. Marisa Tomei 
is one of the top-billed stars and has around fifteen minutes of total screen 
time. 
Joe Charbonic's direction is not good either, and some of the sloppily made 
scenes in the movie are so dumb that I started to get a pounding headache. A 
five year old could have made a better film than this mess. The script is 
somewhat good, but the dialogue that comes out the actors mouth is stiffly 
said, and doesn't make much sense sometimes.
Could "The Watcher" have been a good movie? Its highly doubtful and in the 
end product it clearly shows that Hollywood is starting to run out of steam 
in their movies. With "Almost Famous" coming out in a few weeks, I'm highly 
waiting for a really really good movie worth the watch, and worth the wait of 
a trip to the movie theatre, until then though I tell you to avoid "The 
Watcher" if anything possible, go see "The Way of the Gun" its not great but 
at least its better than this.

Title
Review for Gift, The (2000)
Starring: Cate Blanchett, Keanu Reeves, Giovanni Ribisi, Katie Holmes, Greg 
Kinnear, Gary Cole, Hilary Swank, Kim Dickens, Michael Jeter, J.K. Simmons.
Directed by: Sam Raimi
Running Time: 111 minutes
Rated R: violence, language, sexuality, nudity.
Movies that start out, and capture me from the opening titles are movies that 
do not exist that much. The last movie to make me sit up and watch every 
single moment of the movie was 1999's "American Beauty", of course this year 
we had excellent movies such as "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon", "Traffic", 
and now "The Gift". It's a horror thriller directed by film master Sam Raimi 
that is so moody, well acted, and well written that in the end it is a treat 
to watch.
Annie Wilson (Cate Blanchett) is a young woman in a small-town, who is 
widowed and lives with her three young boys. She brings in the people of this 
town because she is a psychic, and she gives readings for people and they 
give her as in her own words "donations". Annie, of course in this small town 
has a few enemies one of whom is Donnie Barksdale (Keanu Reeves), he believes 
she is a witch and she told his wife Valerie Barksdale (Hilary Swank) to 
leave him because he physically abuses her. Valerie however thinks of Annie 
as a friend as does the mentally unstable Buddy Cole (Giovanni Ribisi), who 
is oddly confused about having nightmares about a blue diamond.
When Annie is called to her son's school after he is in a fight, she meets 
the principal Wayne Collins (Greg Kinnear) which she finds her self attracted 
too, however he is engaged to the young Jessica King (Katie Holmes). When 
Annie sees Wayne and Jessica together she gets a bad feeling that overcomes 
her and sees an image that she will never forget. At a party she sees these 
two again, and goes out to get some fresh air and catches Jessica with a 
wealthy lawyer David Duncan (Gary Cole), she doesn't disrupt the two, but 
learns of the disappearance of Jessica a few days later. The cops are drawn 
to Annie to try to help with her psychic abilities. As Annie is about to find 
out, there is a lot more than what it seems that lies beneath this 
disappearance. 
Sam Raimi has done such a great job with "The Gift" that I am proud to name 
it one of my best films of 2000. The thing that stands out the most in the 
film however is the acting, and especially that of Cate Blanchett in the lead 
role. To me she gives the best female performance I have seen, and definitely 
deserves an Oscar Nomination for her role. She is a very beautiful actress in 
Hollywood, and it's nice to see her starring in good movies (Her last being 
"The Talented Mr. Ripley"). In the supporting roles Greg Kinnear gives a 
somewhat bland performance, and doesn't really suit his character. After his 
Oscar Nominated role in 1997's "As Good As It Gets", he hasn't had really 
many big roles. Keanu Reeves is not one of my favorite actors at all, but he 
gives it all he can, and in the end Keanu Reeves actually clocks in a great 
performance as a realistically scary man. Hilary Swank fresh off her Oscar 
Winning role in 1999's best film "Boys Don't Cry", she gives yet another 
fantastic performance in a great but small role. Gary Cole whom is always 
good, gives a nice creepy performance as the rich lawyer. Next to Cate 
however I think Giovanni Ribisi gives the best performance in the movie as 
the mentally unstable Buddy, he gives it all he can and goes over the top in 
scenes and it works out great. Katie Holmes as the promiscuous Jessica is 
stellar in her performance, and shows she can do nudity in a non gratuitous 
style. Kim Dickens (Hollow Man) is nice in her small role also. 
The script written by Billy Bob Thorton (whom also starred in Sam's 1998 
masterpiece "A Simple Plan") is that of a great one. The dialogue is tightly 
written, and the twists and plot changes come fast and quick. The ending is 
especially surprising, and will leave a tear in your eye, and a smile on your 
face. Sam Raimi's direction puts so much atmosphere in the film, that at 
times you almost seem like you are a character in the film. For those fans of 
Raimi check out the car Cate Blanchett drives, a nice little homage to the 
"Evil Dead" series. 
"The Gift" is one of the best films of 2000, and one of my favorite thrillers 
in a long time. Everything in the movie stands out, from the acting, to the 
script, the direction, to the editing. I can't wait to watch this one again, 
its a winner!
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 1/26/01. (C)

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Rating: * * * out of * * * *   (3.5 out of 5 for Nzone)
Starring: Jet Li, Aayliah, Delroy Lindo, DMX, Isaiah Washington, Jon Kit Lee.
Directed by: Andrzej Bartkowiak  
2000- 128 minutes
Rated R for strong violence, language, drug content, and brief nudity.
Written by Brandon Herring March 24, 2000.
Ok, so there are movies that come out that are just soooo guiltily 
entertaining, that you really cant suffice it and say that movie was good. Ok 
so maybe "Romeo Must Die" isn't one of those movies, but it isn't perfect by 
any means. Hong Kong films are always technically well-made, bloody, violent, 
lightning-paced fist fight, no plot movies. The one exception is "Romeo Must 
Die" a very entertaining, fast-paced thrill ride, that will have you cheering 
by the end, and a smile permanently on your face throughout the two hours.
Jet Li plays a man who is an ex-cop just escaped from prison to find his 
brother's killer in New York. He meets up with singing sensation Aayliah who 
gives a better than you'd think performance. Jet Li plays a Romeo type who is 
avenging his brother's killer, while Aayliah plays a Juliet type trying to 
cope with the fact that her father is a mob boss, and may be responsible for 
the killing of 'Romeo's' brother. The two team up and try to find out the 
truth, leading to a huge finale and some shocking secrets. 
What seems like a thin plot type movie, really is. There is a nice solid plot 
to this movie, though it seems like it has been done so many times before, it 
isn't even funny. The Romeo And Juliet modern day tale, is just that. Man 
loves Woman, Woman loves Man, they can't be together because of their 
families fighting, and their families do not want them to be together. Even 
watching this film, you know your treading familiar water, the fight scenes, 
action, and acting in the film especially by Aayliah makes you overlook that 
stuff, and just enjoy yourself.
Surprisingly enough, Aayilah gives the best performance in the movie, backed 
up great performances from Jet Li, Delroy Lindo and Isaiah Washington, "Romeo 
Must Die" is a brainless action film, with some brains and sometimes no 
action. The film goes from being an action film to a love story, to an action 
film to a love story, yet never loses it's punch to make us the viewer 
continue to like this movie. We are brought to these characters lives, their 
loves, they adventures and their tragedies. Even with all these flaws, "Romeo 
Must Die" continues its way to be a fast-paced thrill ride, that grabs hold 
of the viewer and does not let go until the end credits role.
The cinematography and directing were both flawless, but the script could 
have used some polishing. Of course expect the usual subtitles, but no 
dubbing (yay). This is an American made film, that will appeal to all races: 
White, Black, Oriental, there is something in this movie for everyone, and 
everyone will find something that will appeal to them. Even if the person 
didn't like the movie, I found those people did like something in the movie 
that was memorable. The fight scenes in the movie were more than incredible, 
and some of these stunts are the most amazing martial arts I have ever seen 
on a film strip. Without the fight scenes and the overall entertainment of 
the film, there really isn't much to Romeo Must Die. But when you put those 
aside, you get one fun and wild ride!

Title
Review for Curve, The (1998)
Rated R for strong language, violence, some sexuality and drug content.
Starring: Matthew Lillaird, Keri Russell, Michael Vartan, Randall Bartikoff,
Dana Delaney.
In 1998 a movie was made that was promised theatrical release. That movie was
'The Curve' it was however never released in theatres like it was promised, and
I see why. 'The Curve' is a movie that was well-written and directed by Dan
Rosen who also wrote the clever 'The Last Supper. The cast was well assembled
with lots of talent. Matthew Lillaird who was annoying but funny in 1996's
classic 'Scream', Keri Russell who plays in TV's popular 'Felicity' are all
good in a film that is so wrapped up in it's plot it forgets to include us in
having fun, and takes itself way to seriously.
Matthew Lillaird and Michael Vartan play college roomates Tim and Chris, whose
friend Ran (Randall Bartikoff) girlfriend found out she was pregnant, not
taking it too well he gets drunk and fights with his roomates. A new law has
come out that in the US if your roomate commits suicide than you get a perfect
4.0 grade average for having to go through the whole 'trauma'. They do so, but
when they learn some surprising things about Ran's death Chris doesn't know who
to trust or who to turn to. The ending finale has about 25 twists all rolled
into one, that pretty much saves the film from being a washout.
The film had many flaw in it, including it's plot. It was completely
unbelieveable and the previews I saw for this, they made it look like a horror
movie or even a thriller. It's not in any way intense or scary, mysterious and
overly dramatic it is. What got me the most was the final 5 twists in a row,
that you had to keep up with or you were lost. Some didn't like the ending
which I can see, one twist is good, 2 twists is fine but 5 in a row is
annoying. 
The acting was incredibly above normal, Keri Russell gives the best performance
as Chris's girlfriend, Matthew Lillaird gives a good performance too as does
Michael Vartan. Dana Delaney who plays the college's counselor who learns a few
surprising things about everyone. The movie does prove a good point as in Who
Can You Trust? Because everyone in this movie is not whom they seem at first,
by the end it's like your watching a totally different movie. At 92 minutes the
film does seem to go on and on and on, but finally starts to speed up towards
the end.
So if your in for a fun time at the movies, 'The Curve' is there, but only if
there is nothing else. The final twists and the acting keep it afloat, it's
sometimes clever and sometimes boring, sometimes good and sometimes bad. A
misleading movie to which it is not a horror flick. 'The Curve' is not a bad
movie however it's not all that great either.
Reviewed By Brandon Herring October 2, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
Miss Congeniality  * * * out of * * * *
Starring: Sandra Bullock, Michael Caine, Candice Bergen, William Shatner, 
Benjamin Bratt, Ernie Hudson, Heather Burns.
Directed by: Donald Petrie
Running Time: 109 minutes
Rated PG-13: sexual humor, language, violence.
Movies are made to entertain, some movies are made to give messages, Miss 
Congeniality goes into the entertain category, its a very funny, well made, 
well acted comedy that is quite predictable, but so enjoyable and so fun to 
watch that in the end you forgive all it's flaws. Sandra Bullock gives one of 
her best roles to date, possibly outdoing her role in "While You Were 
Sleeping". 
Gracie Hart is a 30-ish FBI agent, she is single and doesn't have much of a 
love life, when the FBI is trying to figure out the riddles a serial killer 
is sending them, Gracie tries her best as well, they find out that it has to 
do with the Miss United States Pageant, and they want to get their best agent 
to go undercover, and save the girls from this killer. Of course the person 
they pick is Gracie Hart, at first she is doubtful about it, but after she is 
made up by stylist Victor Melling (Michael Caine), they don't think twice 
about it.
Now Gracie Hart must become a lady, and try to blend in with these girls the 
best she can, making friends, and making enemies. The shows two hosts Stan 
Fields and Kathy Morningside (William Shatner and Candice Bergen) are a bit 
skeptical at first, but soon find out Gracie may be able to pull it off. With 
a lot of misadventures and plenty of laughs in between, "Miss Congeniality" 
pulls itself off with its cleverly written dialogue and great performance by 
Sandra Bullock.
Of course "Miss Congeniality" has it's share of flaws, first it is very 
predictable, and the ending is awfully conventional. Aside from these major 
flaws, the movie presents for plusses than minuses. There was times where I 
laughed out loud, which is almost a rarity these days, and the last time I 
laughed even close to this hard was in last summers "Scary Movie". 
The characters are well written out, and the supporting cast Benjamin Bratt 
as Gracie's love interest Eric Matthews, Michael Caine as the flamboyant 
Victor Melling, William Shatner in a great and funny role as Stan Fields, and 
Candice Bergen in full force as Kathy Morningside, along the great Sandra 
Bullock this is definitely a great cast. Donald Petrie's direction really 
shows especially in the end, with the climax of the pageant. 
In the end "Miss Congeniality" is a rewarding romantic comedy, with a flair 
to it. There is never a dull moment in the film, and the jokes come fast and 
furious, and the dialogue very clever and funny. Just don't think too much of 
it, because "Miss Congeniality" is one of the best comedies of 2000.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 1/8/01. (C)

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)

Cast Away  * * *1/2 out of * * * * 
Starring: Tom Hanks, Helen Hunt, Nick Searcy, Christopher Noth, Lari White.
Directed by: Robert Zemeckis
Running Time: 143 minutes
Rated PG-13: intense action, some violence/gore.
Robert Zemeckis may as well be the next genius, even with the not so great 
"Death Becomes Her", Zemeckis gave it a touch to make it enjoyable and 
entertaining, and it even won an Academy Award for it's astonishing special 
effects. Earlier in 2000 Zemeckis brought us the clever and scary "What Lies 
Beneath", and now for the holiday season of 2000 "Cast Away" another pairing 
of Zemeckis and actor Tom Hanks, and behold we have a new 'great' movie to 
add to my top 10 of 2000 list.
Tom Hanks plays FedEx executive Chuck Noland, who is in Europe with his 
"recruits" teaching them how to become faster FedEx employees. He promises 
the love of his life Kelly Frears (Helen Hunt) that he will return to her, 
and does but is quickly called back into work. While boarding the plane he 
mutters the words "I'll be right back" and boards the doomed flight. His 
plane takes a quick nosedive towards the ocean below, and Chuck survives and 
is washed along a shore on a nearby island. Not sure what to do, or where he 
is, he panics but soon starts to adapt to island life. Now he must try to 
survive on the island, as well as not give up hope to get back to his 
life...and his love Kelly.
An amazing story of not only survival and love, but also as a character study 
we get to know who Chuck Noland really is, and what he wants in life. His 
love for Kelly Frears is so strong that I was hoping, and praying he was 
going to make it back home. Of course if you have seen the trailer for the 
movie, you know what happens, and if you haven't then I guess you will have 
to watch the movie to find out. 
Tom Hanks who has starred in several great movies (Saving Private Ryan, 
Forrest Gump, and even Big) he has come to be possibly my favorite actor of 
the century if not all time. He won an Oscar for his brilliant work as a man 
with AIDS fired because he was gay in "Philadelphia"...to his memorable 
character of the sweet Forrest Gump in "Forrest Gump" Tom Hanks has come to 
show he can give great performances, "Cast Away" is no let down. Once Tom 
Hanks graces the screen, he becomes Chuck Noland and becomes a survivor on 
the island. Spending almost an hour and a half on the screen by himself, it 
is absolutely mind-blowing how we are so absorbed by him on this island, that 
the time flies by. 
This may be Tom Hanks' best performance of his career, and with an Oscar 
Nomination on his heels, he certainly deserves it. Helen Hunt who starred in 
the awful "Dr. T & The Women", the funny "What Women Want", and pain inducing 
"Pay it Forward" plays Kelly Frears, the love of Chuck's life. Even though 
she is given maybe twenty minutes of screen time total, what she has is 
fantastic and what she does with it is amazing. A scene towards the end of 
the movie is so touching, that a tear came to my eye and my heart started to 
beat fast. Tom Hanks and Helen Hunt definitely have that screen formula, they 
make a great couple.
Talking before about Robert Zemeckis and his genius direction "Cast Away" is 
no exception, with some of the island scenes being beautifully shot, the 
locations being absolutely marvelous I was quite impressed. While not having 
the nifty camera shots "What Lies Beneath" had, and you have to admit there 
was some cool shots, "Cast Away" relies more on the study of Chuck and his 
survival. The script by William Broyles Jr. is in it's own way mind-blowing 
because of the fact for almost an hour and half as mentioned before, Tom 
Hanks is alone in the movie on the island with only a few lines of dialogue 
said. 
"Cast Away" has a place on my top 10 list of 2000, it's a nearly flawless 
character study of a man who has to rely on himself to survive. Some people 
may try to compare this to the new phenomena "Survivor", but since that show 
has several people, and "Cast Away" has one person...it is quite hard to even 
begin to compare. The ending is something to be questioned, and like most of 
Zemeckis' endings, it can be taken in anyway the viewer wants. "Cast Away" is 
not just a great film, but a great example of how Hollywood still has the 
ability to make good movies.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 3-11-01.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Rated PG-13: Sci-fi action, violence, language.
Starring: John Travolta, Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker.
So I went and saw this film right, it was called "Battlefield: Earth", I was
never interested in the previews, and never too terribly interested in the
book, nor do I find scientology interesting, but after reading advanced reviews
of how bad this film really is, I had that weird urge just to watch it. Well
let me be the first to say, and so far in my view it's safe to say:
Battlefield: Earth might be the worst film I have ever seen, yes even worse
than "Mr. Magoo", "Blue In The Face", or "Jaws: The Revenge".
Roger Christianson whos credits include set direction, and art direction for
such great films as "Alien" and "Star Wars", directs this film with such
amateurism, that the film looks and feels and in fact sounds so dumb, that it's
quite depressing. The look of the film, is dark and drabby at times, but then
bright and happy at other times. The sound is terrible, and has the worst
surround sound effects I've heard. The acting is nothing, the dialogue poor,
and the make-up effects hideous.
Here's the so-called plot: Earth 3000....man is a endangered species, while
aliens from the planet Psychlo (the aliens are named Psychlo...I wonder why?!)
are invading Earth, destined to put an end to those "man-animals" to an end,
and destroy Earth once and for all, of course we have our typical hero (played
terrible by Barry Pepper, who was great in a small role in 1999's "The Green
Mile") who is destined to go out, and save his planet! One thing: he has to go
up against, Terl, the chief of security Psychlo, who is played frankly, quite
bad by John Travolta, whom with dreadlocks, a big head, and green eyes just
doesn't work. Of course the sidekick to Terl, is played by (LOL!!) Forest
Whitaker, who looks like a deformed werewolf of some kind. Our friendly human
Johnny (Barry Pepper) looks just as bad as well, with long scraggly hair.
I'm not really sure how to quite explain the badness of this film, except just
to say it's terrible. Everything in this film is imcomprehinsable, from the
make-up effects, which by the way aren't good, to the phony looking special
effects, everything in this film is faulted. In fact I don't remember one part
in this entire movie where I was having a good time, or enjoying myself. In
fact there is no part in the movie that I liked or enjoyed. Throughout the
entire 127 minute running time, I was dying, constantly looking at my watch,
and hoping maybe the projectioner would blow a bulb or something, sadly it
didn't.
My advice to Hollywood: Get new scripts, new acting classes, better directors
and damnit, make films like American Beauty More.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 5/12/00.
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Rated PG-13: intense action, violence, sensuality.
Starring: Tom Cruise, Thandie Newton, Dougray Scott, Ving Rhames, Sir Anthony
Hopkins.
In 1996, the world got to see Tom Cruise, in the big screen adaptation of
"Mission: Impossible". Although the film was a huge hit (grossed 181m in the
USA and 465m worldwide) to me it was quite a disappointment. Sure it had
action, special effects, and great acting, but to this day I still cannot
remember there being a REAL plot. A sequel had been in talks for a while, and
now four years later, "M:I-2" finally arrives in theatres, and let me be one to
tell you, its alot better than the first film, and while the plot is just as
thin, I had way too much fun!
Tom Cruise returns as special agent Ethan Hunt, the film opens with Ethan on a
cliff, climbing to the top, which seems impossible, but they its a movie.
Anyway this time his mission if he chooses to accept is: To stop a madman, who
wants to get a newly created virus in his hands, and the antedote, so he can
collect his $37,000,000 pounds (English dollars). Ethan Hunt, has to try and
figure out his plan by having a woman spy Nyah (played by the ever so beautiful
Thandie Newton) to go back to Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott) and act like she is
his girlfriend again. Of course this is all the plot you get to work with, he
tries to get the virus for his money, and the antedote, but the stunts and the
action is so incredible that in the end all is forgiven!
With Tom Cruise returning as Ethan Hunt, he gives a great performance, if an
over baked performance, when at times he does go over the top, but its classic
Tom Cruise. He fits well into the role, and seems to be having fun. Thandie
Newton is a great actress and was in the 1998 movie "Beloved" with Oprah
Winfrey. Here she is all out with a British accent, and tightfitting clothes.
She is a beautiful actress and a great one at that. Dougray Scott who as in the
hit "Ever After" is the bad guy here, and surprisingly plays a bad guy very
well, his accent fits in very well to the bad guy role. The rest of the cast
includes Sir Anthony Hopkins in a fantastic short role, Ving Rhames as usual is
great too.
John Woo is such a fantastic director, that in his action/stunt sequences, all
is forgiven for the thin plot in the film. I mean some of these car crashes,
explosions, and some spectacularly choreographed fight scenes, that when they
are over all your left with is your mouth wide open. His 1997 film "Face/Off"
was a huge hit in the box office, a huge hit with critics, and a huge hit with
audiences, and this one is destined to be a huge hit at the box office, with
critics and with audiences. The action in the movie is amazing, the acting
great, John's camera angles were jaw dropping, and the movie had great
atmosphere.
So even though like the first film, the plot is as thin as chicken broth, I had
fun with this movie. Its a typical action film, but nothing could have prepared
me for some of the stunts I witnessed in this movie. See it and have fun!
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 5/22/00.
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Rating: * * * out of * * * *   (3.5 out of 5 for Nzone)
Starring: Jet Li, Aayliah, Delroy Lindo, DMX, Isaiah Washington, Jon Kit Lee.
Directed by: Andrzej Bartkowiak  
2000- 128 minutes
Rated R for strong violence, language, drug content, and brief nudity.
Written by Brandon Herring March 24, 2000.
Ok, so there are movies that come out that are just soooo guiltily
entertaining, that you really cant suffice it and say that movie was good. Ok
so maybe "Romeo Must Die" isn't one of those movies, but it isn't perfect by
any means. Hong Kong films are always technically well-made, bloody, violent,
lightning-paced fist fight, no plot movies. The one exception is "Romeo Must
Die" a very entertaining, fast-paced thrill ride, that will have you cheering
by the end, and a smile permanently on your face throughout the two hours.
Jet Li plays a man who is an ex-cop just escaped from prison to find his
brother's killer in New York. He meets up with singing sensation Aayliah who
gives a better than you'd think performance. Jet Li plays a Romeo type who is
avenging his brother's killer, while Aayliah plays a Juliet type trying to cope
with the fact that her father is a mob boss, and may be responsible for the
killing of 'Romeo's' brother. The two team up and try to find out the truth,
leading to a huge finale and some shocking secrets. 
What seems like a thin plot type movie, really is. There is a nice solid plot
to this movie, though it seems like it has been done so many times before, it
isn't even funny. The Romeo And Juliet modern day tale, is just that. Man loves
Woman, Woman loves Man, they can't be together because of their families
fighting, and their families do not want them to be together. Even watching
this film, you know your treading familiar water, the fight scenes, action, and
acting in the film especially by Aayliah makes you overlook that stuff, and
just enjoy yourself.
Surprisingly enough, Aayilah gives the best performance in the movie, backed up
great performances from Jet Li, Delroy Lindo and Isaiah Washington, "Romeo Must
Die" is a brainless action film, with some brains and sometimes no action. The
film goes from being an action film to a love story, to an action film to a
love story, yet never loses it's punch to make us the viewer continue to like
this movie. We are brought to these characters lives, their loves, they
adventures and their tragedies. Even with all these flaws, "Romeo Must Die"
continues its way to be a fast-paced thrill ride, that grabs hold of the viewer
and does not let go until the end credits role.
The cinematography and directing were both flawless, but the script could have
used some polishing. Of course expect the usual subtitles, but no dubbing
(yay). This is an American made film, that will appeal to all races: White,
Black, Oriental, there is something in this movie for everyone, and everyone
will find something that will appeal to them. Even if the person didn't like
the movie, I found those people did like something in the movie that was
memorable. The fight scenes in the movie were more than incredible, and some of
these stunts are the most amazing martial arts I have ever seen on a film
strip. Without the fight scenes and the overall entertainment of the film,
there really isn't much to Romeo Must Die. But when you put those aside, you
get one fun and wild ride!
"Sometimes there is so much beauty in the world, I feel like I can't take it,
like my heart is going to cave it"- American Beauty
"He came home"- Halloween
"Things fall down, people look up, and when it rains it pours" Magnolia

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
Rated R: strong sexual humor, language, drug use and comic violence/gore. 
Starring: Shannon Elizabeth, Shawn Wayans, Marlon Wayans, Carmen Electra, 
Anna Faris, Kurt Fuller, Regina Hall, Cheri Oteri. 
Spoofs have always been a favorite of mine in the movie genre. You go into 
the movie theatre and laugh until your side hurts. Movies like "Airplane" and 
"The Naked Gun" are some of my favorite spoofs. We haven't had many 
full-force spoofs of horror movies lately, and since "Scream" itself was a 
modest spoof why not spoof "Scream", one of the biggest grossing horror films 
of all time. Hey why not also spoof "Friday the 13th", "Blair Witch", "I Know 
What You Did Last Summer", "Matrix" and "The Sixth Sense", not to mention a 
ton of other films. "Scary Movie" is just that, a well-made horror movie 
spoof that isn't short on its laughs. 
The movie starts out just like the movie it is spoofing, "Scream". Drew 
Becker is at home all by herself, popping popcorn when she gets a call from 
an all too familiar voice asking her if she likes scary movies. If you've 
seen scream, then you know the rest, except this time you get some comical 
twists and a clever opening title. The film then goes to B.A. Corpse High 
School where we meet Cindy Campbell  (Anna Farris) (notice a trend?) who has 
just informed her friends Buffy Gilmore (Shannon Elizabeth) and Jill that 
Drew Becker was killed last night. Gail Hailstorm (Cheri Oteri) is right on 
the spot as she tries to get some tidbits from Deputy Doofy. The killer then 
stalks Cindy and her friends, as she starts to think maybe her boyfriend is 
the killer. As they get comically killed off one by one, they must try to 
stop him before the movie is over! 
The movie is chock full of sexually explicit jokes and sight gags, as well as 
prostethic organs, as well as some blood. The violence though played for 
laughs is surprisingly a bit strong, although never offensive or anything. 
The jokes are played out very well, and the dialogue is extremely smart. 
About 80% of the jokes work, but on occasion they get old and worn out, 
because it seems to go on and on. The film references to films are at times 
utterly hilarious, and the sight gags are extremely funny as hell. The scenes 
that were the funniest had me laughing so hard I couldn't breathe. 
The cast plays the film out very well with Shannon Elizabeth the standout. 
Newcomer Anna Farris plays Cindy Campbell very well, and plays the victim 
very funnily. Marlon and Shawn Wayans who also wrote the film together, do a 
great job with their characters Shortie and Ray. Some of the jokes in the 
film are at times pretty risque, but always ride the line of never being 
offensive, except some of the prostethics in the film. The film's best spoof 
scene is of  "The Blair Witch Project" and even though I love that movie, I 
will admit it was a very funny scene. 
The main problem with "Scary Movie" is that it follows "Scream" to a T with a 
few surprises here and there, with a clever twist at the end. The characters 
are all a standout, and the actors bring them out with full force, forcing us 
to laugh hard. The direction by Keenan Ivory Wayans is classic, and very well 
done. Horror fans and fans of the movies it spoofs will get alot out of this 
film, that might go down as a spoof classic along the lines of "Airplane" and 
"The Naked Gun". It's far from being a perfect film, but I could definatly 
watch it over and over and laugh each time at something new and funny. 

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
Starring: Helen Mirren, Katie Holmes,  Melissa Coughlan, Barry Watson, Vivica
A. Fox, Molly Ringwald.
Rated PG-13 for thematic content, language, violence, and sexuality.
By first glance 'Teaching Mrs. Tingle' looks like a teen comedy with lots of
laughs. Well it is a teen movie, but the laughs are there, but not as much as I
had hoped. I did however like the plot, and the performance by Helen Mirren,
which saves the movie from being a washout. She is a very good actress, and it
shows in this smart, clever, and sometimes funny comedy/thriller. Katie Holmes
delievers another good performance, besides the mediocre performance by Barry
Watson, the film seems to have all it takes to be a successful film, now we
just have to get past the box-office performance of this movie for being so
long-delayed.
Kevin Williamson, the 'mastermind' behind films such as 'Scream and Scream 2'
'I Know What You Did Last Summer', 'Halloween: H20', and 'The Faculty' wrote
and directed this movie. He as most of you know also writes and executive
produces the popular TV show 'Dawson's Creek.' He did do a good job with
writing and directing this movie. The script is very clever with some good
lines and gags. The directing which he did himself was good too, except for
some derivative camerwork. 
Katie Holmes plays a not-so-rich girl names Leigh Ann. Her friend Jo Lynn
(Marissa Coughlan) (Notice the two names?). After Mrs. Tingle (Helen Mirren)
gave a not-so-good grade to Leigh Ann for her history work, she has to do extra
credit to make up. A guy named Luke (Barry Watson), who stole a copy of Mrs.
Tingle's final exam test, gives it to Leigh Ann, and sticks it in her bag.
After Mrs. Tingle finds out, she goes right to to the principle's office. He's
not there so she goes home.
The kids go to her house and try to explain what happened. After some words are
spewed, Mrs. Tingle is grazed by an arrow, and knocked out cold. The kids tie
her up, and try many things to keep her quiet, blackmail, torture, and making
her feel bad. But Mrs. Tingle is the teacher from hell. She has no feelings, no
heart, no nothing. Some surprising revelations are found towards the end, which
makes Mrs. Tingle a whole new person. 
I must say, this movie IS NOT the best ever made. Nor is it ever close to being
great. But the movie itself was entertaining, and I did enjoy it. I thought
some of it was ludicrous (AKA Jo Lynn's re-enactment of 'The Exorcist'). But it
was non-the-less enjoyable. The acting was good too. I was kept on the edge of
my seat by the end, and was glad I got to see this movie. "Teaching Mrs.
Tingle" is no classic, but it is a worthy peice of work by Kevin Williamson.
Reviewed August 21, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
WARNING: Contains what The Matrix is.
Starring: Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Joe Panteliano
Some may be disappointed with The Matrix. I'll tell you I was. I sat there and
sat there and sat there waiting for something to happen. Now wait wait, I know
most of you loved it, and I'm not saying I didn't like it. What I'm saying is
the first half was extremely slow. Now seeing the trailer it makes you think
the whole entire movie is one big special effects show. Don't be fooled, this
movie has a big story. And big chunks of talky moments. But I will admit the
special effects and the acting were above par, deserving the rating above.
Ok now to the story. Well this may take a while. Ok first of all, our world we
live in now, is not the real world, actually we live inside a computer
generated world known as The Matrix. A man played by Keanu Reeves is about to
find that out, when is kidnapped and almost coaxed to go into the real world.
He does so, and finds out that he can do anything, be anything he wants to be.
But he has to fight a 'Matrix skipping' bad guy, who wants to send him back to
his own world or destroy him.
Laurence Fishburne, his guide of sorts plays his character well as does Keanu
Reeves. But I sat in the theatre for over and hour wondering where all the
special effects were. Yeah there were some in the first half but not enough.
The trailer for this movie was really decieving making people think that this
was a special effects laden movie.
Now for the second half, it is explosive, and saves the movie. Some of the
special effects and fighting were breathtaking. The sound, the music, and all
the effects were effective, and the last hour kept us entertained. But with a
running time of 2 hours and 20 minutes, this movie is at least 40 minutes too
long. One would have wished for a better 'Matrix', but I do have to say, I did
like it and I was entertained.
Reviewed April 5, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
Rated: R for strong violence/gore, language, and sexuality.
Starring: Jennifer Morrison, Joseph Laurence, Matthew Davis, Hal Bochner, 
Anson Mount, Eva Mendez, Jessica Cauffiel, Anthony Anderson, Loretta Devine, 
Michael Bacall. 
Out of all the rip-offs of Wes Craven's instant 1996 classic "Scream" and 
including it's sequels, only two really stood out as being original. The 
first was 1997's "I Know What You Did Last Summer" which was followed by a 
lame sequel, and the second is 1998's "Urban Legend" which went on to gross 
more than $38 million dollars, a nice sum for a low-budget horror film. Of 
course the ending left it open for a sequel, but one would hope they wouldn't 
make one. Surprise...they did anyway, and this time it has nothing to do with 
the original, well it does, but it doesn't. 
Amy Mayfield is a student at the Alpine University, majoring in film. She 
worked on a few of somebody elses, but her main goal is to make her own 
movie. After hearing a story about a university, where the students were 
murdered based on Urban Legends, she herself decides to make a movie called 
what else? Urban Legends. Everything goes well, her film starts production, 
but when she finds a reel of film she didn't make, showing a murder, Amy 
starts to suspect something isn't right. Once the people working on her 
production start to get killed in the style of urban legends, Amy knows there 
is a killer after her, and she has to try to stop him before he gets to her.
Of course there is the usual refereces to urban legends, and the plot 
developments of the story. Wait...we're missing something, oh yeah character 
development duh! I should have known that, but wait where is it at? Oh yeah 
there is none! Thats the biggest flaw of the entire movie, is the lack of 
character development. When the movie first starts, we go into a comedic 
opening sequence, and are introduced to the characters, of course we know who 
they are as in names, and we know what they do, but we don't know anything 
about them. 
In her first starring role, Jennifer Morrison, is great as the film student 
Amy. She brings out the most she can of her character, and does a credible 
job of playing her. Matthew Davis is in dual roles, as the bland 
Travis/Trevor, and doesn't really add much to the film, except a gratitous 
sex scene. Joey Lawrence is pointless in his role, but adds much to the comic 
relief. The two or actually three biggest standouts of the movie is the 
George Lucas fan duo, Michael Bacall and Anthony Anderson are extremely 
funny, and add much to the film, but not much to the story. Finally Loretta 
Devine is the standout of the movie, and should get much credit to saving 
this movie from being a bust.
The direction by John Ottman is very stylish, and since he is an editor and 
composer, he of course, edited and composed this movie. Both are very nice, 
and the score is a standout, when this dvd comes out, I would like to see a 
isolated score, just to hear this, because it adds much to the tight 
atmosphere. The movie itself, is never scary, excluding one scene that has to 
do with the tub, ice and kidney. This was very gruesome and quite intense. 
John Ottman did a good job on the techinal well-making, that he forgot to add 
more excitement and suspense.
Overall the movie is entertaining throughout, and merits at least one watch. 
The killer is fun to guess, and I was surprised at who it was, although the 
motive is laughable. At the end, they change the slasher ending into 
something different, and the end of the movie before the credits role, I 
thought was extremely funny and very clever. The standout scene of the movie 
is the end, and at the end of the movie, I turned to my friend and said "That 
was ok, nothing special, but nothing bad". It deserves one watch, if not two. 
It really has nothing to do with the original, and really is pointless, but 
for what it's worth it isn't that bad. 

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
Rated PG-13: action, violence, partial nudity.
Starring: Hugh Jackman, Halle Berry, James Marsden, Anna Paquin, Patrick 
Stewart, Ian McKellan, Rebecca Romaijn-Stamos, Famke Jansen, Bruce Davison, 
Ray Park, Tyler Mane,
Running Time: 100 Minutes (dependant on which movie theatre you are in) 
So here it is, the film fans have been waiting for for over a decade, 'X-Men' 
finally comes to the big screen in an all-out adventure, full of eye popping 
special effects, great stunts, fantastic acting and a wonderful story. When I 
first heard they were making a live action version of the movie, I was quite 
skeptical. I knew I was going to see it, but I wasn't sure if it was going to 
be good. Then the first teaser trailer came out and I lost all hope. It was 
so dumb and so confused they should have just left it alone. Then a few weeks 
later the full trailer came out and I was stunned, the film looked great, it 
looked wonderfully edited, directed and acted and I was hyped up to see it. 
Finally the day came I got to see it, and I must say I was a bit 
disappointed, but I still enjoyed the film immensely.
The movie follows the cartoon and comic books to a T. I don't want to ruin 
the story so I will just tell you the basic plot: Mutants are despised by 
humans, because of some of the things they can do, the senate wants mutants 
to come out in the public with what they have, and register themselves so we 
are aware of what they can do. Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart) is 
a very powerful mutant who has made a school for the gifted children who have 
these certain powers. Rogue and Wolverine are two confused mutants who meet 
each other in a bar after Rogue witnesses Wolverines sharp claws almost go 
through a guys throat. He takes her with him on the road, but a ways down 
they hit a tree and Logan (Wolverine) is thrown through the window, then 
being attacked by a evil mutant Magneto's pack. 
Then we finally get to see the good guys, Storm and Cyclops rescue Wolverine 
and Rogue and bring them to the home of Professor X. Wolverine isn't quite 
sure of what is going on, but soon realizes that this place is where he needs 
to be to live safe and free among other mutants, Rogue who was always scared 
of what she could do, now lives freely in the home. Magneto a very powerful 
mutant is after the X-Men because of the powers he has and because he is 
aware that there is a war brewing between humanity and mutants. Professor X 
and his team of X-Men must try to stop Magneto from destroying the entire 
world before its too late. Hold on to something because your in for a ride!
Don't worry I didn't give much of the plot away, thats just an outline. The 
film is very well conceived with its plot, and I was pleasently pleased to 
find out that each character has a backstory which adds much to the study of 
these people. I realized however when the film was over that even though it 
didn't have that much action, this movie is just starting it all. The sequel 
(which is coming out) will be continuing it, and so on and so on. The 
direction by Brian Singer (The Usual Suspects) is  amazing, the action 
scenes, and the choreography in the film is amazing. The special effects are 
mind-boggling and some of them look incredibly real.
The characters we have is Wolverine (Hugh Jackman) who is a great character, 
brought to life by an emotional back story. Hugh Jackman brings the character 
to the screen with a bang, and is probably the only person who could have 
played Wolverine this good, Anna Paquin plays the mysterious Rogue, which as 
first I was skeptical about, but after seeing her play the part I will say I 
was impressed by her motions and by her accent she put to the character. 
Famke Jansen plays Jean Gray but for some reason her character seems pushed 
back and not doing much, but non-the-less she does a great job in her 
character, Halle Berry does a good job on playing Storm, but either she 
didn't bring the character out as much as she could have, or the character 
just wasn't brought out in the script, because like Jean Gray she seems a bit 
pushed back. James Marsden is good as Cyclops, and is given some great comic 
relief between him and Wolverine. Perhaps the best performance of the X-Men 
is Patrick Stewart who is priceless as Professor X, he plays him with such 
agility, such expertese that he gives one of the best performances Ive seen 
this year.
Of the bad guys, Rebecca Romaijn-Stamos plays Mystique who is a 
shapeshifting, very sexy character that is completely naked with blue all 
over her body. Of course its PG-13 so you cannot see anything. Tyler Dane 
plays Sabretooth and is extrmely well at it, Ray Park who played Darth Maul 
in Episode 1 plays Toad here who is a pointless character but non-the-less a 
great one. Of course the best of the bad guys is the fantastic Ian McKellan 
who brings out the character of Magneto more than anyone else could, there is 
a scene in the film when Patrick and Ian are together talking and it is 
amazing to watch these two talented actors work.
Even though the movie has these pluses, it also has its minuses. First of all 
some of the characters are undeveloped, for instance we don't get very much 
background on Cyclops of Jean Gray. There are many scenes that seem to go and 
on with talky dialogue, and not enough action. The climax of the film is very 
well made, but I found that it went way to fast. Of course these flaws come 
with the movie because it sets up for the sequel. Even with these flaws, 
seen this year. Its worthy of a movie theatre trip possibly twice or even 
three times. For the fans of X-Men like me, your gonna love it!

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
What if a man could hear what was in a woman's mind? What if you were a woman 
standing on the street, and a man was standing there with you listening to 
every thought you had, that's exactly what happens in Director Nancy Meyers 
delightfully new comedy "What Women Want" starring an all star cast with Mel 
Gibson, Helen Hunt, Lauren Holly, and Marisa Tomei. 
Nick Marshall is your typical businessman: Low-key, abrasive, comical, 
charming, handsome. He has a daughter Alex who is a typical 15-year old, and 
while her Mom and new Step Dad is on their honeymoon, she stays with Nick for 
a few weeks. Many things however are going to change in Nick's life, he has a 
new boss Darcy Maguire (played fantastically by Helen Hunt), his daughter is 
planning on having sex, and after having an accident involving a bathtub, 
dryer, and women's accessories, Nick is about to change forever: He can head 
what women are thinking.
Surprised by this new thing he has, Nick isn't sure what to do with this, and 
while his job status is starting to dwindle down to nothing, his daughter 
hates him, and a woman is in love with him, Nick isn't sure what to do! After 
meeting with his old shrink Dr. Perkins (Bette Midler who in a small role is 
memorable) he realizes that he may just be the luckiest guy in the world. So 
he uses it the best he can, and when his company is offered a new account he 
uses this skill to come up with the best ideas he can. However obviously 
there is some downsides, he can hear what every woman is thinking about, 
about him, about someone else...and even his daughter.
"What Women Want" is a hilarious romantic comedy, guided throughout with a 
great performance from Mel Gibson, he dominates the screen throughout the 
slow parts, and through the cleverly written script. He brings the character 
of Nick Marshall to the screen, and embeds himself in our minds. Helen Hunt 
(her third appearance on the big screen this year, her fourth is released a 
week after this "Cast Away") clocks in yet another great performance right 
behind her "Pay It Forward" performance. She is a talented actress, and I am 
glad to see her in a role that seems to fit her quite well.
The rest of the supporting cast includes a wonderful performance by Marisa 
Tomei (too bad she hasn't had many jobs lately, she is an excellent actress), 
a funny performance from Loretta Devine, and a memorable cameo by the Diva 
herself Bette Midler. These people support the main cast, and to me it was 
the performers themselves who kept this movie afloat it's lengthy 126 minutes.
Nancy Meyers is a talented director, and this is no letdown, she does a great 
job directing the film, with some nice cinematography, but again the biggest 
flaw of the film is that is seems to go on and on and on, and almost an hour 
and forty minutes into it I started wriggling in my seat, knowing there was 
another twenty minutes left. 
Although with this flaw in the end "What Women Want" is a treat for fans of 
Gibson and Hunt, they give great performances, and the movie is completely 
and totally entertaining throughout, go ahead give it a try and find out 
"What Women Want".
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 12/19/00

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Rated R: strong sexuality, nudity, language, drug use, violence.
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Annette Bening, Mena Suvari, Wes Bentley, Thora Birch.
In the history of movies, some really good movies have come out. They have 
been memorable in our minds, and make us think about them even to this day. 
They can be 100 years old, to only a year old and still be a great film. 
Sometimes they are so good it is hard to explain to someone how good it 
really is. Out of the 1,000s of films I've seen, only one has impacted my 
life so much that to this very day I still think about the movie. It's 
incredible how a film of this standard can sweep the Oscars and audiences 
alike, and be one of the best reviewed films of all time with the critics. 
This movie is that one certain movie, a movie that I saw in theatres close to 
twenty times, but never got tired of the movie, and everytime I viewed it, 
found something new and beautiful.
Kevin Spacey plays an unhappily wed man Lester Burham, married to Annette 
Bening who plays Carolyn, who is unhappy as well, but hides her feelings 
underneath where they bottle up inside of her, ready to pop. Their marriage 
is extremely unhappy and close to falling apart. Thora Birch brilliantly 
plays their daughter Janie Burnhan who has troubles of her own, she thinks 
she isn't pretty and wants new boobs, only to realize that she is beautiful 
in someones eyes. Her neighbor Ricky Fritts (played amazingly by newcomer Wes 
Bentley) who uses his video camera to tape the world as he sees it through 
his eyes, everything has its own beauty in its own way. Mena Suvari impacts 
the screen as Janie's best friend Angela, whom Lester falls for and starts to 
work out, and becomes more rebelous. His life is falling apart, as is the 
world around him, coming to a shocking and deeply emotional, yet oddly 
compelling and satisfying ending.
Kevin Spacey won an oscar for his portrayal of Lester Burnham, a depressed 
deeply complex man who wasn't given enough time to do what he wanted to do, 
but what he did was amazing. Kevin takes the character and turns him into a 
real person, instead of a movie character, he knows what he is doing and 
makes us laugh, think and cry at the same time. Annette Being is one of my 
favorite actresses and she does not let me down here, she takes her character 
and like Spacey turns her into a real person so we feel for her but at the 
same time we hate her in some scenes. She is a character that has her perks 
and her downs. In one of the best teen performances to lighten the screen in 
a long time Thora Birch is absolutely magical as the daughter of this 
disfuctional family. She is so realistic to today's teens and so compelling 
that I feel she is almost a lead character in the movie as is Mena Suvari who 
plays Angela, she does a wonderful job as well. Wes Bentley stands out as the 
next door neighbor boy who sees beautiful things in his own way. Absolutely 
magical acting.
The script is a whole other story combined, this is one brilliant screenplay. 
Alan Ball who wrote this screenplay is to me a brilliant, very smart man who 
has a mind that no one can read or understand. He is very complex and it 
shows in his script, it makes you think while it makes you cry because of how 
beautiful it is, the dialogue comes out of the performers lips so smoothly, 
and they seem to be associating with it, possibly even relating. The audience 
(or at least I was) is in such awe of how amazing this movie is, that we 
almost become a character ourselves. We see through each of the persons eyes, 
and we see how they see, what they see and how what they are seeing affects 
them.
Sam Mendes makes his directing debut, and I must say I was really surprised 
by how good of a job he did on his directing, his camera shots are just plain 
out brilliant. Some of the shots especially towards the end are emotionally 
affecting towards me, and I found myself sitting there with my mouth wide 
open absorbed into this movie. The twists and turns in the story, the 
performances from the actors and actresses, the script that is so good it is 
unbelievable. I tried to find a flaw in this movie, but there was no flaw at 
all. Each and every scene is beautiful and amazing in its own way, never has 
a film made me cry at the end because of how beautiful it is.
To me it's safe to say, although your not supposed to as a movie critic, but 
I can say American Beauty ranks up there as my favorite movie I have seen. 
Besides Halloween, American Beauty is my favorite movie. Some people have all 
time favorites and plenty of them, and believe me I have many favorites, but 
this one I can safely say is my favorite one.

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
Comedy, Fable, Story...these three words best describe the delectable 
"Chocolat", the new film directed by Lasse Hollstrom (1999's The Cider House 
Rules). There are films out in the world that are just great, but not worthy 
of Oscar Nominations. In 1999 "The Cider House Rules" took the world by 
surprise and received an Oscar Nomination, of course even being a fantastic 
movie, it wasn't a movie that needed an Oscar Nominator. In 2000 "Chocolat" 
was nominated for Best Picture, and unfairly as well for still being a good 
movie, it isn't Oscar Material.
The film starts with a prologue of a voice-over of a woman, telling about a 
small village in France. This is a peaceful, humble village where all the 
people go to church every Sunday, they all keep their streets clean, and 
their children all go to a nice school. One Sunday the North wind brought in 
a chill, but also a surprise, for two new people are moving into this small 
French Village. Vianne Rooter (Juliette Binoche) and her young daughter Anouk 
Rocher (Victoire Thivisiol) open up a Chocolate shop in this town, and take 
it by surprise. For Vianne herself puts special ingredients in her chocolat, 
for such things as sexuality, moodiness, or insomnia. Much despised by the 
townfolk, especially by the mayor Comte de Reynaud (Alfred Molina), they try 
to run them out of the village, but of course Vianne stands up for herself 
and tries to prove that she is not a bad person, but just a different one. 
The movie's underlying tone is that of a good message, there are a lot of 
stereotypes in the film, and the character of Vianne tries to stop that in 
this town. A feeling of warm and fuzzy overcomes the viewer as the end 
credits go up, and you are left with a smile on your face and a thought in 
your head. Lasse Hollstrom's direction is very nicely done, especially in the 
opening sequence with a nice CGI effect of a camera drop in on the town 
(which for being described as very small, it actually good size). 
The characters are very nicely portrayed by many well-known faces. First up 
is the French Actress Juliette Binoche (who is nominated for an Oscar for her 
role, and deservedly so), she is a very beautiful and graceful actress who 
brings out the best of her character. Dame Judi Dench (who is also nominated 
for an Oscar) for her role as the cranky landlord of Vianne. Two well known 
American actors are also involved in this project. Carrie Anne-Moss of "The 
Matrix" fame, does a great job playing the uptight character of Caroline 
Claimont (who we find out some interesting tidbits about), and the misplaced 
character of Roux (played well by Johnny Depp) the pirate type man who almost 
brings the town to a stop.
"Chocolat" is based on the novel by Joanne Harris, and is written for the 
screen by Robert Nelson Jacobs. His script is well written, with some clever 
and witty dialogue that actually had me laughing out loud a couple of times. 
This isn't your type of comedy where your going to be bent over laughing, but 
a nice, sweet little comedy where a smile comes over your face and even a 
laugh here and there.
Even with these good things, "Chocolat" suffers it's share of bad things as 
well. Besides being somewhat predictable, the characters especially that of 
Roux are needless, and really just cliched. In my opinion, the film would 
have been better without him. Also a sequence in which I got so mad I almost 
left, and then it just turned around of course just messing with our 
feelings. It may sound like I am ragging on this movie, but believe me I'm 
not, just a few flaws the movie has. In the end, "Chocolat" is a rewarding 
experience that I could watch many times, and never get tired of.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 2/25/01.

Title
Review for Exorcist II: The Heretic (1977)
After the huge success of "The Exorcist" in 1973 a sequel was inevitable, and 
sadly like most horror fims that make money, the filmmakers decided to make a 
ridiculous sequel, that makes absolutely no sense at all, and to me was 
extremely pointless, wasting Linda Blair and Max von Sydow completely. 
Needless, dumb sequel flopped in the box office, and never gained much 
success though it is voted as one of the worst sequels of all time, to which 
I agree with.
To start the "story" it is four years later, and Regan is being tormented by 
memories of what used to be, now a priest played by Richard Burton, is trying 
to figure out why this demon tried to possess Regan, and now the demon 
somehow wants to possess her again (maybe she was good or something). Now 
they must try to stop this demon from taking over Regan's body, before it is 
too late.
Some of the bad things Exorcist II has in it is: Linda Blair, she had no need 
to revive her character, and she is really terrible in this film, she brings 
it down to a lull, and in places it seems like it just stops in its place, 
and doesn't go anywhere. Louise Fletcher is alright for what it's worth, but 
she could have done a lot better than this.
The direction by John Boorman, is that of a confused, stylish nature that I 
really couldn't figure out. In fact, I had no idea what was going on in this 
film, the script was jumbled, the plot was jumbled, and the ending is just 
laugh out loud hilariosly bad. For those Exorcist fans who haven't seen this 
one, I recommend renting it.
I actually gave this one a high rating, if it were any worse it would have 
deserved Zero Pumpkins, I went easy on it however because of the fact that it 
has a bit of good direction, but nothing else! Im not saying I like the film 
now, so dont start going anywhere. Bad, Bad, Bad Movie.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 11/19/00

Title
Review for Halloween H20: 20 Years Later (1998)
Rated R: horror violence, gore, language.
Starring: Jamie Lee Curtis, Michelle Williams, Jodie Lynn O'Keefe, LL Cool J, 
Josh Hartnet, Adam Arkin, Janet Leigh.
In 1978 John Carpenter created the most terrifying film ever put on a piece 
of film. It shocked audiences in movie theatres, and was named the next 
'Psycho' by many critics. It became one of the biggest cult films of all time 
and remains my favorite horror film of all time. I am a huge fan of Halloween 
and I try to collect everything I can on it. A sequel followed in 1981 and 
was a great film, as well as a big box office success. A third, fourth, 
fifth, sixth and now seventh film followed, with only two, four and seven 
being truly good. When I heard they were going to make another Halloween film 
with Jamie Lee Curtis I almost peeed in my pants because I was so happy, and 
I must say I was quite impressed on how good this film was being the seventh 
movie in a long running series.
Keri Tate (Jamie Lee Curtis) is a young woman tormented by memories of her 
past, because her name used to be Laurie Strode, who was the sister of 
Michael Myers to whom he came after her 20 years ago. Keri is now living in 
California with her son as the head of a school. She lives with her 17 year 
old son (Josh Hartnett) who is a bit rebelious along with his girlfriend 
(Michelle Williams). Keri or Laurie as I should say has told no one about her 
past and how her brother tried to kill her, and how she faked her death. But 
on one unfaithful night, Halloween 20 Years Later terror never dies because 
Michael Myers has come back once again to stalk Laurie and her son, but this 
time its a fight to the finish, and this time its final.
The movie is well directed by Steve Miner who does a great job with some of 
his death scenes while putting plenty of suspense in them as well. His camera 
shots are chilling, and he puts John Carpenter's classic score in the movie 
very well, and once scene at the end put chills down my back, I realized this 
time Laurie is hunting down Michael, instead of vice versa. Kevin Williamson 
who is known for his "Scream" and "Dawson's Creek" fame writes the screenplay 
surprisingly well, but makes it way too screamish at times, but never out of 
sync with the Halloween atmosphere. 
Jamie Lee Curtis makes a sensational return to the horror genre, and brings 
her character Laurie Strode back to life. After being tortured for years, you 
can still tell Laurie is scarred by what happened those 20 years ago. She 
brings Laurie out to her fullest and constantly I thought of scenes from the 
first movie. She is without a doubt the best thing in the movie. Josh 
Hartnett plays her son and although he is good in the part, you can really 
tell he is acting. He doesn't seem to want to be there at times, which is the 
opposite with his girlfriend played fantastically by Michelle Williams. To 
round out the cast there is more good performances from Jodi Lynn O'Keefe and 
Adam Arkin of the Chicago Hope fame.
The movie has its goods as described above and has many chills and scares in 
it, but its major flaw comes from the fact that it seems too teenish and 
screamish at times, if only John Carpenter and Debra Hill got back together 
and made this film. It's also way too short, and there is too many jump 
scenes.  But even with these flaws "Halloween: H20" is a fantastic sequel to 
my favorite horror film.

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
Rated: R for graphic violence and gore, language, nudity and some sexual 
content.
Starring: Elizabeth Shue, Kevin Bacon, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg 
Grunberg, Mary Jo Randle, William DeVane.
Horror films are always a favorite of mine. I will admit I've never really 
seen an invisible man thriller, except the tepid spoof "Memoirs of an 
Invisible Man" which Chevy Chase, which really wasn't all that good. Anyway 
when I heard of Hollow Man, I thought wow hopefully this will be a genuinely 
scary movie, with a great cast, great writing, and some great scares. So I 
went into the movie expecting all these things, and surprisingly the movie 
lived well up to my expectations even though I sometimes had doubts about it. 
"Hollow Man" is a very scary, gory, well-acted, even erotic horror story.
The story is about Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) who is the head of a secret 
lab, where they try to make animals invisible, and it works. Sebastian is 
however tired of testing on animals, and without permission from the 
pentigon, to which is funding all this, he decides to have his crew made up 
of Linda Foster (Elizabeth Shue), his ex flame, Matt Kensington (Josh Brolin) 
her boyfriend, and the rest of the scientists, Frank, Sarah, Carter and 
Janice. They inject him with the fluid that makes him invisible, but after 
being invisible for a while, Sebastian starts to go a little crazy, and goes 
out and does some bad stuff.
Linda now threatens to tell the pentagon about what has happened, which 
really makes Sebastian mad, and he goes a little crazy ending up in a 
exciting, very intense climax that left me more than satisfying. One warning 
about watching this film is that the gore in this movie is over-the-top in a 
good way. There is a copius amount of gore in the film, along with some very 
graphic violence, one shocking scene of violence almost made me sick, however 
do not let the violence get in the way of you seeing this movie. It really is 
surprisingly a good horror movie, with a great cast and great special effects.
For the cast, Kevin Bacon heads the cast as Sebastian Caine, and does a very 
good job in the lead role. He is very scary as a villian, and around 1/4 of 
the film it is only his voice. Sometimes however it is what you can't see 
that scares you the most, and "Hollow Man" is no exception. There are some 
genuinely scary moments in the film, and I was surprised at how much I was 
really absorbed into the film. Elizabeth Shue plays Linda Carter, and as 
always clocks in another great performence. She brings out her character very 
well, and adds yet another good performance to her record. To round off the 
cast Josh Brolin does a great performance as well, but seems a bit held back 
in his role. The supporting roles by Kim Dickens, Greg Grunberg, Mary Jo 
Randle, and Joey Slotnik, adds some depth to the movie and completes the cast 
very nicely.
The special effects are jaw-droppingly good. Sometimes I was so intruiged by 
the film that I lost interest in thinking they were special effects, and 
thought they were real, which at times scared me. The one complaint I may 
have had about the movie is that fact that the violence might turn off alot 
of viewers, which sadly might kill some of the box office. Hopefully all you 
reading this who don't like violence will still give the film a chance and 
have fun with it. Paul Verhoeven's direction is nice as well and the pricey 
$85m dollar budget really shines in the end. One more complaint is that they 
bill William DeVane as a major character, when he is in only two small 
scenes, but oh well you take what you can.
In the end however "Hollow Man" delivers the goods: it's extremely intense, 
smart and sometimes clever thriller, that tends to dive towards the slasher 
genre, but quickly goes back to its horror routes. The dialogue is a bit 
cliched, and over-ridden, but everything else in the film is top-notch. It's 
one hell of a summer ride!

Title
Review for Dracula 2000 (2000)

Hey guys...Im going to be sending reviews again in email, but I am not going 
to have a website of my own, instead you can read my reviews here:  The Movie 
Insider  or here:  reviews by Brandon Herring.I have a new format, but my 
writing is going to stay the same. ~Brandon
Dracula 2000   * * out of * * * *
Directed by: Patrick Lussier
Running Time: 97 Minutes
Rated R: strong vampire violence, gore, sexuality, language, bried nudity.
Cast: Gerard Butler, Christopher Plummer, Jonny Lee Miller, Justine Waddell, 
Colleen Fitzpatrick (aka 'Vitamin C'), Danny Masterson, Jeri Ryan, Jennifer 
Esposito, Lochlyn Munro, Omar Epps, Sean Patrick Thomas.
In 1922 an original, and very scary film came out called "Nosferatu"...he was 
the first image of a character of Dracula...and now almost eighty years later 
Dracula is resurrected to the big screen once again in this mind-numbing 
effort from first time director Patrick Lussier, who is Wes Craven's editor. 
This is the billionth Dracula film ever made, and to me it seems the more 
they make them, the worse they make them.
The last good Dracula film (actually the last Dracula film) was 1992's 
lavishly made "Bram Stoker's Dracula" which gained critical and audience 
raves, and made a ton of money at the box office. Sixty years before that was 
the movie that made Bela Lugosi popular and that was "Dracula". This year we 
get a new Dracula film for a new generation.
"Dracula 2000" opens with an interesting montage of scenes from a ship years 
ago, with dead and bloody people on the ship, obviously attacked by some 
creature. We then shoot to London, England 2000 where we meet Simon (Jonny 
Lee Miller) and his father like figure Abraham Van Hesling (Christopher 
Plummer). They run a museum with a very special exhibit locked away deep 
inside a vault. When the vault is robbed of it's exhibit, Abraham reveals 
what was locked away in this vault: Dracula himself...now he is on the loose 
in modern day London.
Meanwhile Mary (Justine Waddell) is having visual nightmares of a black 
haired man who haunts her in her dreams, he stalks her, finds her, and then 
disappears as she wakes up. Her friend Lucy (Colleen Fitzpatrick) thinks she 
is just lacking sleep, but Mary knows something is wrong, something deep 
down, something in her family. After Abraham reveals yet another shocking 
secret, he and Simon must find Mary and save her from Dracula, before it's 
too late, whilst Dracula stalks around town, making even more vampires appear 
in the town.
Wes Craven's lead editor Patrick Lussier clocks in his directorial debut 
(although he directed last years direct to video "The Prophecy III") and he 
does a good enough job keeping the film on it's heels, but somewhere towards 
the fourty-minute mark the film takes a turn and starts to get oddly 
confusing, and the rest of the film I was so confused I had to ask my friend 
what just happened, he couldn't answer my questions, for he was as confused 
as I was.
Lussier seems to want to make more of an action film, than a hardcore Vampire 
film, in the ending climax "The Matrix" technique using slow-motion while 
showing the trail of a bullet is excessively overused, and gets really old, 
really fast. The acting on the other hand is very well done with Justine 
Waddell clocking in a grat performace as the lead woman Mary, Christopher 
Plummer and Jonny Lee Miller are great as well, and the rest of the 
supporting cast with Jennifer Esposito (who is as beautiful as she is 
talented) is the stand-out in the supporting cast.
Lussier also wrote and edited the film, which only one he did successfully, 
the writing is not that good at all, and this film I can safely say has a 
terrible script, with some bad dialogue and bad jokes, however the editing is 
fantastic and Lussier seems to be able to do at least one thing good. Overall 
Dracula 2000 is a so-so horror film, that isn't scary at all, but seemed to 
keep my attention throughout it's short runtime of 97 minutes. See it with 
caution, and don't expect to see too much.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 12/22/00.

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)
After 2000's visual feast "The Cell", Jennifer Lopez takes a complete 360 and 
makes a wonderfully flawed romantic comedy, that even with the predictability 
and cliched dialogue still captured me in my seat and kept me entertained 
throughout. Jennifer Lopez and Matthew McConaughey have such great formula as 
an onscreen couple, that it is impossible not to like them, if not the movie.
Maria "Mary" Fiore (Jennifer Lopez) is a young wedding planner who has been 
single for a while, and is married to her work. After getting her high heel 
shoe stuck in a sewage drain in the street, she is rescued from a menacing 
trash dumpster on it's way to smoosh her. Her rescuer is non-other than Dr. 
Steven James Edison, a pediatrician whom takes care of the bump on her head. 
Instantly she falls in love with him, and soon to find out...he is the groom 
of the next wedding she has planned, the same wedding that will make her go 
up in her business. Now she must try and figure out how to get through it, 
and how to fall out of love, with the one person that might truly be the one.
A light, fluffy romantic comedy "The Wedding Planner" is not a bad film at 
all. Through the opening credits and through the end credits I was 
entertained and had fun with the film. It does however have a few flaws, 
which come from the predicability and the cliched dialogue (how many times do 
we have to sit through the "How much I love you, but I'll never get you 
speech?). In the end however, you get that warm fuzzy feeling inside, and 
leave with a smile on your face, and your heart warm warmed up.
Adam Shankman, a choreographer of several movies including 2000's "Mission to 
Mars", 1999's "Inspector Gadget" and "She's All That", this is his first 
major motion picture as a director and he does do a good job at making a 
movie. Nothing special goes into a romantic comedy, so nothing special is 
expected and what is Adam Shankman gives it. The cleverly written dialogue by 
Pamela Falk and Michael Ellis is funny and fun to listen to.
For the acting, Jennifer Lopez in the title role is to me, the only person 
really cast for this role. After hitting it big in 1997's "Selena", Jennifer 
Lopez shows she can do any film, comedy, thriller, drama. She is great in the 
title role, and very funny as well. Matthew McConaughey is somewhat miscast 
in the role as Steve her love interest, and acts a bit like he doesn't want 
be in the movie. In too many scenes he is too plain and drained. Bridgette 
Wilson as the groom of the wedding is a beautiful and talented actress, and 
she gives a good performance as well.
"The Wedding Planner" is a nice, subtle romantic comedy that would make a 
great date movie. It's one of those movies you could watch a couple times, 
then leave it on the shelf, then watch it again. Its not even close to being 
a bad movie, but then again its not even close to being an excellent movie 
either.

Title
Review for Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000)
Rated PG-13: language, crude/sexual humor. 
Starring: Eddie Murphy, Janet Jackson, Larry Miller, John Ales, Eddie Murphy, 
Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy. 
In 1996 the world was introduced to a new version of the classic Jerry Lewis 
film "The Nutty Professor", the movie was a huge hit (almost $130m 
domestically) and continued Eddie Murphy's big hits. The movie was very good, 
very funny and quite sweet. When I first heard there was going to be a sequel 
I was a bit iffy on it, wondering how they would make a sequel to it. So we 
waited four long years to get a sequel to the beloved comedy, and it is here, 
even though it isn't as good as the original, and not many sequels are, its 
still a great way to contiune a great comedy series. 
This time around Sherman Klump is happy, its a couple years later from the 
first film, and he has a new girlfriend, Denise Gains (played quite well by 
Janet Jackson). But the other side of Sherman, Buddy Love is bothering him, 
he keeps hearing him inside of him, he keeps saying and doing stuff Buddy 
would do, Sherman decides to get the strand of DNA that is inside of him that 
contains Buddy Love out, but with some distrous results, Buddy Love becomes 
his own seperate person, and goes off to try to make Sherman a dumb person. 
Because since Sherman put Buddy out of his blood stream, he lost an important 
part of himself, and is never going to be the same unless he has Buddy Love 
back inside of him. 
The film has a side plot on it, but I will let you guys watch that yourself, 
so as not to spoil anything of the movie. This movie although Sherman is a 
big part of the film, this time his family is the main characters as well, 
providing alot of information about his family that in the first we really 
didn't get to know. We get to know the Klumps more than before, and know that 
they are more than just an overweight, farting family. They are sweet people 
who have troubles just like Sherman does, and at times we really feel for 
them. Eddie Murphy does a fantastic job of playing all these characters, in 
all he does six different characters and does them all justice. 
Janet Jackson is another standout, in her second starring role on the big 
screen (her first being "Poetic Justice") she does justice to her character. 
Her and Eddie Murhpy have great chemistry on screen and make a cute, 
believable couple, they both bring their characters out to the fullest, and 
are at times very believable. Larry Miller who played the head of the college 
in the first returns, and as always gives a wonderfully comical performance 
with his character, and in one scene his character has a little run in with a 
hamster that is unbelievably funny, I almost died laughing. 
The script was written by Steve Oderkerk, Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz of the 
"American Pie" fame, and is quite cleverly witty and at times downright 
hilarious. There is a few downsides to the movie though, first of all the 
plot is a bit underdeveloped, it jumps around a lot from one plot the other 
and I said once in the movie "I'm confused", but it quickly developed a solid 
plot around 45 minutes into the movie. The movie also has alot of good points 
to it, first up is the acting which is fabulous as described above, second is 
the script which is well written, and third is the wonderul make up effects, 
which one an Oscar for the first film, they are very well made, and disguise 
Eddie Murphy in all his characters quite well. 
Direction by Peter Segal is nice too, but his plot points are a bit jumbled, 
but besides that "Nutty Professor II: The Klumps" is a film that will be 
enjoyed by fans of the original, and maybe if your not even a fan of the 
original, I think you will still like this sequel. Its a good sequel, that 
leaves the question open; "Is Nutty Professor III that far away"? 

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Rated: R for violence, language, and some sexual content.
Starring: Tom Hanks, David Morse, Bonnie Hunt, Michael Clarke Duncan, James
Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Graham Greene, Doug Hutchison, Sam Rockwell, Barry
Pepper, Jeffrey DeMunn, Patricia Clarkson.
Stephen King has always made good horror movies (The Shining, Misery, Cujo) but
one might cringe at the fact of a drama coming from the hands of Stephen King.
Remember, however Stephen King also brought us great films such as "Stand By
Me" which became one of the best-known 'buddy flick', and "The Shawshank
Redemption" both movies being spectacular in every way and surprising people by
knowing that the horror master himself Stephen King wrote both of those books.
Now in 1999 we get yet another Stephen King masterpiece this one being better
than the ones mentioned above, it is strikingly original, emotional, powerful
and so absorbing that by the end we are left in a state that we sit in our seat
too amazed to move.
Tom Hanks plays Paul Edgecomb a guard at a prison in Louisiana. He works with
inmates on death row who have committed crimes and soon go to the Electric
chair. A new inmate comes aboard by the name of John Coffey (Like the drink
only spellt different) who is accused of killing two little girls. John Coffey
however even though the size of him (played by Michael Duncan "Armageddon's
Bear") John Coffey is a nice man. Paul Edgecomb starts to find out that maybe
John didn't kill those little girls. Then John does the most amazing thing ever
and Paul realizes that what they are dealing with here is a miracle...on The
Green Mile (as in the prison walk). Now Paul must try and prove that John did
not kill those little girls...and get him off death row before he must be
killed.
The best thing about this whole movie is the performance by Michael
Duncan...who gives in my opinion the best performance of the year. In fact he
might even give the best performance of all time with his southern accent...and
sweet side Michael Duncan is truly brilliant. Tom Hanks (who never gives a bad
performance) yet again delivers an Oscar Worthy performance in this three hour+
film that seems to go by in no time. Surprisingly enough with such a dramatic
atmosphere and story the movie also has a big amount of comedy and witty
dialogue that doesn't seem beligerant or unnecessary.
The supporting performances by Michael Jeter who plays an inmate with a cute
little mouse named Mr. Jingles is also truly a great actor who gives a great
performance as does David Morse, Bonnie Hunt, James Cromwell and Patricia
Clarkson who all give believeable and powerhouse performances. The screenplay
by Frank Darabont who also directed the film is well-crafted and stays very
close to the book. The whole movie moved me in a way no other movie has and has
it's special magic like this years earlier masterpiece "The Sixth Sense" which
had it's own substance to take the viewer by the hand and leads then through an
amazing experience that after it is over they are left in their chair unable to
move.
In other words "The Green Mile" finds it's own path and makes it's own
miracles. It's never slow and it's never too dramatic. The best thing about the
film is that you yourself become a character and you yourself are there
watching what is happened instead of watching it as a movie. Movies that do
this are always magical and as the tagline for the film goes "Miracles are
found in the most unexpected places" and therefore "The Green Mile" is a
miracle all of it's own.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring December 18, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Art of War, The (2000)
Rated: R for strong violence, language, drug use, nudity, and some sexuality. 
Starring: Wesley Snipes, Anne Archer, Michael Chaykin, Donald Sutherland, 
Marie Matiko. 
I've never fully understood Wesley Snipes's career. He has his ups and downs, 
but mostly the downs. His best movie was one of the best of 1998 and that 
movie was entitled "Blade". He has had his typical action movies, "Boiling 
Point", "Passenger 57", but his new movie "The Art of War" should just be 
called "Rising Sun 2: The Art of War" cause basically it's a semi-remake of 
the same plot, with a different cast, and forced to be a ridiculously 
unbelievable thriller, that is high on style and low on substance. 
Wesley Snipes plays a James Bondish type secret agent working for the U.N. 
After a chinese ambassador is killed, he is on the track of the killer, 
trying to find out who it is, how it happened, where the killer was, and what 
to do. Anne Archer plays his "boss" type person of the U.N. and she has hired 
Snipes to track down the killer. Well Snipes is mistakenly framed as the 
killer, and is now an outlaw, kidnapping a Chinese woman with him, and having 
her help him along the way. All this leads to a finale that is so dumb, and 
so stupid that is it unbelievably dumb, and the stunts, dialogue and acting 
all ruin this movie. 
Wesley Snipes isn't one of my favorite actors because of the fact that the 
character he plays in every movie is the same character he plays in the movie 
before. The only good role Snipes has really had was in 1998's "Blade". I 
walked into "The Art Of War" expecting a good, high octane thriller, and all 
I got was a pile of mush. The only real 'good' thing the movie has is action, 
and plenty of it, but I noticed it is badly filmed, the camera is so shaky 
you cannot even tell what is going on. The ending finale is so worthless and 
pitiful, that it even tries to mock "The Matrix", laughably funny, it is 
undeniably stupid. 
Christian Duguay's direction is also not that great. His camera angles and 
sense of style are all in place, but sadly his lighting and editing are all 
badly done. Even the whole "Matrix" ending wasn't even good. The stunts and 
action are badly filmed, and badly choreographed. His placing of the 
characters, and the assination of the Chinese Ambassador, and the plotting of 
the movie are so predictable and laughable, that it just takes all the fun 
out of the entire movie. Anne Archer who is usually good in her roles, turns 
in a horrible job here. She is sour, downbeat, and dreadfully dull with her 
forced dialogue, and dumb moves. Even Donald Sutherland as a co-star can't 
save this movie from being a bust. 
So for an overall opinion: "The Art of War" is a total waste of time. It's 
not entertaining, nor exciting, or even action packed. It is a pointless 
movie, and makes absolutely no sense at all. If you really want to see a good 
version of "The Art of War", rent the Wesley Snipes and Sean Connery action 
vehicle of the same kind "Rising Sun", it isn't a great film either, but at 
least it's better than this. 

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
Rating: * * * * out of * * * *    (* * * * * for NZone)
Starring: Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Marg Heleberger, 
Cherry Jones, Peter Coyote, Veanne Cox, Conchata Ferrell.
Directed by: Steven Soderbergh
2000--131 Minutes
Written By Brandon Herring March 17, 2000
So far in the year 2000, we have not had a great movie. So far in the year 
2000 only 7 films have gotten *** or more, two films have gotten Zero Stars. 
I was starting to give up on movies so far, when I came along this gem, which 
has become a huge hit. Julia Roberts is probably my favorite actress in the 
world, and starred last year in one of my top 10 favorites "Notting Hill". 
Roberts was mostly known for her roles in romantic comedies such as "Pretty 
Woman" and "Runaway Bride", now in the year 2000 Roberts comes back in a role 
much different from her past, this time she is a tight skirt wearing, 
foul-mouthed, sexy paralegal in the first great movie of 2000.
"Erin Brokovich" is the incredibly true story of a young woman (brilliant 
played by Julia Roberts) who is the single mother of three, married twice and 
divorced twice, living in a run down house with roaches, battling a lawyers 
office which happens to be her job, and her love life is on the rocks. This 
is the everyday of Erin's life. The film starts out with Erin getting into a 
nasty accident, and sueing the guy responsible for hitting her. She ends up 
working for this lawyer's office led by Ed Massery (played greatly by Albert 
Finney). Erin is hired reluctencly as a paralegal, and ends up investigating 
a very serious case in her real estate files, which has to deal with people 
on this once piece of land, whose water comes from PG&E, ends up developing 
cancer after living on this land, and drinking this water. Erin meets a young 
woman played fantastically by Marg Helenberger who is being attacked with a 
handful of diseases, and Erin gathers up enough people who in the past have 
lived on this land to file a lawsuit. What insues is a uplifting story, and 
an incredibly showcase of acting. 
Julia Roberts who starred last summer in one of my favorite movies of all 
time, 1999's "Notting Hill", has again come through and made another movie 
that is howlingly funny, devistatingly sad, and in the end uplifting and 
powerful that a tear came to my eye because I felt so good. Julia gives yet 
another Oscar-calibur performance, and her portrayal of a single mother here 
is priceless. Roberts being not a mother in real life, is so believable that 
you'd think she has kids secretly. Her on screen chemistry with the camera is 
beyond descriptive words, and only the mind can imagine how good Julia is. 
Her snappy dialogue written by Susannah Grant has some brilliantly funny 
lines, and very smart words come out of this woman's mouth. Julia and her 
tightfitting clothes are another character trait in this film, she is always 
in cleavage showing, short tight-fitting skirts that always show off not even 
enough. She in the end is powerful, yet subtle, foul-mouthed, yet gentle 
woman whom we fall in love with by the time the credits role.
Her supporting actors notably Albert Finney are fantastic, and back up the 
lead actress with charisma and charm. Albert Finney plays Erin's boss, and is 
incredibly effective in his role. He gives us a believable man, who owns a 
business and is having this young woman work for him, which we all know could 
not be that easily done. In the end again we fall in love with him as well. 
Aaron Eckhart most notable from "In The Company of Men" and "Your Friends & 
Neighbors" is an on screen gem playing Erin's gruff, biker boyfriend Robert, 
who behind all the facial hair, and ruff and tuff image, is a sweet natured 
guy, who falls in love with both her and her kids. 
Directed by Steven Soderbergh who gave us 1998's fantastic "Out of Sight" 
strikes gold once again, with this realistic, breathtakingly fresh view into 
Erin's world, and the effects it has on Erin's family. Not only does he do 
such a good job at being a director, as he does making good movies. If 
Soderbergh continues to make movies like this, I will continue to praise 
movies like this. When you walk into a movie, and expect the best, and get 
even more it is a rare feeling to know that movies like this can come out. 
Even though only being March of 2000, I can already tell right now, "Erin 
Brokovich" is already one of the best films of 2000, and so far the best 
movie I have seen of 2000. 

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
Traffic   * * * * out of * * * *  
Starring: Benicio Del Toro, Michael Douglas, Don Cheadle, Catherine 
Zeta-Jones, Erika Christensen, Luis Guzman, Jacob Vargas, Dennis Quaid, Amy 
Irving, Topher Grace, Miguel Ferrer, Steven Bauer, James Brolin, Benjamin 
Bratt, Tomas Milian, Albert Finney.
Directed by: Steven Soderbergh
Rated R: strong drug content, violence, language, sexuality, some nudity.
Running Time: 147 minutes
Steven Soderbergh's "Traffic" is so good, that I don't think any word in my 
mouth could describe the perfectness of this film. In the style of 
"Nashville" or "Magnolia," "Traffic" is based on a miniseries that played on 
BBC in 1989. The gritty content, and the shaky camerawork will definitely 
turn off some viewers, but for the others, they will walk out of "Traffic" 
with their mind working overtime, thinking about what they just saw.
The film consists of different plots, each their own, and each brilliant and 
insightful, the first has Javier Rodriguez (Benecio Del Toro) and Manola 
Sanchez (Jacob Vargas), two cops out to bust a cocaine smugglers in Tijuana. 
After the plan is unsuccessful thanks to the General, they are hired to find 
an assassin who is linked to a wealthy drug dealer Carlos Ayala (Steven 
Bauer).
In the second plot, drug dealer Carlos Ayala is arrested by federal agents in 
front of his wife Helena (Catherine-Zeta Jones) and their child David. After 
her son is threatened by someone linked to the business, Helena who is six 
months pregnant with their second child, is forced to find $3 million 
dollars, to keep their son's life safe, and theirs as well. In an attempt to 
save their lives, Helena becomes the caretaker of her husband's business.
Michael Douglas is Ohio Supreme Court Justice Robert Wakefield the newly 
appointed Drug Czar for Washington, DC. Trying to crackdown on the drug war, 
his daughter Caroline (newcomer Erika Christensen) is a drug addict herself, 
and along with her boyfriend Seth (Topher Grace off "That 70's Show) tries to 
keep this habit a secret from her father.
DEA Agents Ray Castro and Montel Gordon, who's key witness in the case 
against Carlos Ayala, the two must keep an eye out on Helena, and her home. 
Not knowing she has taken over her husbands drug dealing business. The two 
here seem to keep the film's comic relief alive, and somewhat moderate 
throughout the film.
Steven Soderbergh has created an American Masterpiece, and there is so much 
going on in this film, that after it was over I was ready to watch it again 
to see if I missed anything. After his successful year last year with "Erin 
Brockovich" which to me was on par with this film, his talent continues to 
show, especially in this film. His use of different colors for each story is 
pure brilliance, and complete originality, the use of the camera, the 
graininess throughout the film, and the style to which he directs his 
fantastic.
The cast is another story all together, every single person in this movie is 
amazing in their own way, to start Michael Douglas gives one of his best 
performances to date and he graces the screen and shows that he is a true 
actor. As his daughter newcomer Erika Christensen is realistic and true to 
her role, as the tormented teen. Amy Irving has not been seen on the screen 
for a while, but she proves she is a great actress, and her performance is 
almost heartbreaking. Catherine-Zeta Jones gives her best performance, after 
her dreary performance in 1999's "The Haunting", she comes back with force 
and shows to be a beautiful, wonderful actress. Dennis Quaid although not 
seen throughout the film that much, gives a good performance, but to me isn't 
given enough to do. 
Don Cheadle and Luis Guzman are equally great in their roles, and they 
provide wonderful comic relief for the audience, and for the movie as well. 
Their chemistry onscreen is natural, and two seem to be having fun with their 
roles. Possibly the best performance in the film comes from Benicio Del Toro, 
who after last year's flop "The Way of the Gun" gives an absolute excellent 
performance, his eye movements, his body movements, his dialogue and the way 
it comes out of his mouth, this is my pick for the best male performance of 
2000.
The brilliantly written script by Stephen Gaghan is expertly crafted, 
beautifully thought out, and the dialogue is great as well. Stephen 
Soderbergh's "Traffic" to me can rank up there with mosaic's such as 
"Nashville" and "Magnolia", its study of the character's and their lives is 
that of nothing ever seen before. Prepare for Traffic, its going to be heavy 
today. One of the best, and most powerful films of 2000.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring, 1/5/01.

Title
Review for Spy Kids (2001)
Spy Kids  * * * out of * * * *
Starring: Carla Gugino, Antonio Banderas, Alex Vega, Daryl, Sabara, Alan 
Cumming, Teri Hatcher, Cheech Marin, Danny Trejo, Mike Judge, Tony Shalhoub.
Directed by: Robert Rodriguez         
Rated: PG (mild violence)
After the genuinely repellent "family" comedy "See Spot Run"...I was starting 
to think that the good family movie genre was out. Alas "Spy Kids" opens and 
goes against all I just said, but it is the best family movie to come out in 
long time, and is the best time I had at the theaters so far this year. The 
young actors prove themselves worthwhile, and the adult actors are just as 
great.
Surprisingly from the man who directed violent movies such as "Desperado" and 
"From Dusk Till Dawn" there is barely any violence let alone blood or gore in 
this movie. Robert Rodriguez wrote, directed and produced this tale about two 
young kids Carmen and Juni Cortez who find out their parents (Carla Gugino, 
and Antonio Banderas) are international spies and have been kidnapped by an 
evil kids show host, who wants to take over the world. Of course the kids 
must take the action upon themselves and save their parents by using the 
nifty gadgets, spy equipment etc. 
In the end the film is a rewarding experience worthy of multi viewings, and 
your kids and even yourself will find yourself loving this film. Young Alex 
Vega and Daryl Sabara (sister and brother characters) play Carmen and Juni 
Cortez, the two seem to be real life friends as they work great together and 
have a good onscreen chemistry. Carla Gugino (Snake Eyes) and Antonio 
Banderas (Desperado, Assassins) play the parents of the kids, and also have a 
surprising amount of strong chemistry between the two.
As for the supporting cast Alan Cumming (Spice World, and the current Josie 
and the Pussycats) plays the scheming bad guy and is a very good actor. He 
seems to be having fun as the bad guy, and some surprising information is 
given about him in the end. Teri Hatcher has a small role, and in her role 
she is deliciously diabolical and funny as well. Some other great cameos 
include many people from Rodriguez's earlier movies.
Rodriguez's cleverly written and witty script is that of a great one. His 
dialogue is snappy and comes quickly out of the actors/actresses's mouth. His 
plot is very easy for younger people to understand and follow, and has no 
sex, scatological humor, bloody/violence or even cussing. Only a mild amount 
of violence occurs in the film, and it's much nice to see this than some man 
falling out of a window with his pants off into dog poop.
"Spy Kids" is one of the funniest movies I've seen so far in the year 2001, 
and is the best kids movie so far. See it with your entire family, and even 
those who aren't fans of kiddy movies you might find yourself having a lot of 
fun with this one. A winner.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring (4-9-01)
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Brandon+Herring

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
Starring:  Piper Perabo, Maria Bello, Adam Garcia, John Goodman, Melanie 
Lynskey, Izabella Miko, Bridget Moynahan, Tyra Banks, Del Pentecost, Michael 
Weston.
Jerry Bruckheimer has struck gold in his career. He has many action 
blockbusters on his hand, for instance already this year he as the $95+ 
million grosser "Gone in 60 Seconds", and in the past we've seen movies from 
him such as "Con Air", "Armaggedon" and more. Now he returns to his 
"Flashdance" route and has produced "Coyote Ugly" a "Flashdance" meets 
"Cocktail" type movie, but minus the male in "Cocktail" and add the female 
character from "Flashdance" and boom you have "Coyote Ugly" a glitzy, 
well-directed, plotless feature that is admittedly entertaining.
Violet Sanford (Piper Perabo) has been writing songs for along time her life 
now.  She has always wanted to go to New York, 42 miles from the house she 
has lived in for 21 years, and write music and make it big in the world. She 
leaves the house and her loving father (John Goodman) to go to New York, 
everyone's dream place to live and try to make herself something. She gets a 
job at a bar entitled "Coyote Ugly" which you will find out what exactly that 
means when you watch the movie, but this is no ordinary bar to say the least 
"Coyote Ugly" is a bar where the waitresses dance on the bar, to hip music 
while horny men (and women) watch and cheer them on.
After she doesn't find much success in her music career, she is given this 
job as a fluke, and quickly and fortunately becomes very popular. People come 
nightly to see her, she has friends in the Big Apple, and success as she 
always wanted, though not the success she quite wanted. Violet then meets a 
handsome young man named Kevin O'Donnell who is well played by Adam Garcia. 
The two hit it off, but he is a bit skeptical about her dancing on this bar, 
while guys throw money at her. He is an australian cook at a greasy fast food 
bar, and her life in New York begins.
What really disappointed me about "Coyote Ugly" was the plot, of course if 
you really want to call it a plot. This so called plot is to thin, that you 
can virtually see through it. It was virtually your usual; want to go to New 
York to make it big type movie, and really doesn't work. I was entertained 
throughout the film, but in the last thirty minutes the movie takes a 
devastating turn to the worst and turns sappy and overbaked. This movie would 
have been really good had it have a solid plot, and even from the trailers 
you can even tell there wasn't much of a plot.
Besides being full of cliches, "Coyote Ugly" still delivers the goods. The 
direction by David McNally is very well done, and the bar scenes are 
extremely glitzy and glamorous and I found myself at times dancing (a little) 
in my chair. Well-edited and timed, these scenes are the highlight of the 
movie, and are extremely sexy and almost erotic at times. In a way its a bit 
like "Cocktail" and "Flashdance" in these scenes, they are very well 
utilized, and mixed with some great music we have. One scene with water is 
definitely the highlight of the bar scenes. 
Acting department is credible, with Piper Perabo being the standout, her 
first big starring role (besides this past summers "Rocky and Bullwinkle"). 
Perabo is a talent, and in this movie its shows, even though she isn't really 
given that much to work with, what she has she uses well and brings out her 
character the best she can. She is a beautiful and talented actress, who is 
on her way to bigger things. Of course the supporting cast Maria Bello as 
Violet's boss Lil, is great too, and she has an edge to her that makes her 
character even more likable. John Goodman is as always a great actor, and 
doesn't disappoint here, he is comical and great to watch on the screen. The 
rest of the coyotes give good if somewhat bland at times performances.
Even with these flaws "Coyote Ugly" is in its own way a good movie. It never 
stopped entertaining me, and I was actually getting into it, somewhat despite 
there was little plot. The acting and bar scenes are really what make this a 
good film. It wouldn't be hard to recommend this movie, but I really can't 
say I loved it.

Title
Review for Gojira ni-sen mireniamu (1999)
Rated: PG for some language and menacing action/violence.
Starring: Takehiro Murata, Naomi Nishida, Mayu Suzuki, Hiroshi Abe, Shirô 
Sano.
When you walk into the movie theatre to see "Godzilla 2000" please do not 
expect to see "American Beauty" or "Gone with the Wind", and do not expect to 
see a re-hash of the 1998 Hollywood bomb "Godzilla". Nope this is the real 
thing, Godzilla in all his man-in-rubber-suit, bad mouth doesn't movie at the 
same rate as voice does dubbing, over the top acting, bad dialogue, cheesy 
effects and big time entertainment. That is what a Godzilla movie is made of, 
and "Godzilla 2000" is just that!
In a continuation of the typical Godzilla story, Yuji Shinodo (Takehiro 
Murata) and his daughter Io (Mayu Suzuki) of the Godzilla Prediction Network 
are once again on the run for Godzilla, trying to find him, watch and study 
him. With the help of a stubborn reporter Yuki Ichinose (Naomi Nishida) who 
is mostly along to take pictures, they must stop a madman Mitsuo Katagiri 
(Hiroshi Abe) from trying to kill Godzilla for destroying the city over all 
these years. Since they really do not understand who Godzilla is, they take 
the usual approach: Don't understand it, Kill it. The GPN team must try to 
stop him from doing this, while a strange rock is found underwater and ends 
up being an alien spaceship from millions of years ago, to which is bent on 
destroying Japan. Now it is time for Godzilla to do his job, and destroy this 
monster before its too late.
Surprisingly enough "Godzilla 2000" is a huge entertainment piece, that I 
really had fun with. I laughed at the cheesy part of the film, and believe me 
it's all there. You cannot help but like these kind of movies. They are the 
so bad it's good type movie, with the overacting, odd dialogue and bad 
dubbing. One thing that I wasn't expecting was the special effects, which 
were surprisingly good for this type of low-budget movie which is set to 
become a camp classic. First up the acting is horrible, but its pretty bad, 
typical for this kind of movie, but the lead stars keep it afloat and give us 
something to chuckle at. 
Godzilla himself is so cool looking, and even at one point I could see the 
hole in the head on the roof of his mouth where a light bulb was to light up 
his eyes. He strides around the city destroying everything in site. Burning, 
crashing, stepping on, hitting, whatever he can do he definitely does it. So 
of course one cannot help but compare this movie to the 1998 big Hollywood 
Bomb "Godzilla". Even though the 98 version wasn't a horrible movie, it was 
far from being good. You just can't americanize a Godzilla movie, it's just 
not possible. There's no bad dubbing, or special effects, everything is in 
place and it really just doesn't fit in.
So on one of those MST3K type of scales "Godzilla 2000" is a great film to 
watch with a group of friends, or when your in the mood to watch just an 
entertaining movie. So go ahead to your local movie theatre, pay the cheap 
matinee price and see "Godzilla 2000" believe me, it will be one of the 
funnest times you've had at the movies this year. Great fun.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
May contain objectional material and spoilers.
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
The movie opens with this message:
"In October of 1994, three student filmakers disappeared in the woods near
Burkittsville, Maryland, while shooting a documentary....a year later their
footage was found."
"The Blair Witch Project" is a brilliant, inventive, original and downright
horrifying movie that isn't your typical scare people by jumping type. This
movie has only shot of blood, no violence, no ghosts, no witches or anything.
What the movie does, is make your imagination run wild, and makes you scared by
what you don't see. The movie has no scary music and no jump scenes. The scares
are strong and long-lasting, and when something is happening it doesn't go to
another scene, it stays on that scene till it's over.
The movie is in a style of a documentary. Three film-makers: Heather Donahue,
Joshua Williams, and Michael Leonard. The three travel to Burkittsville,
Maryland to film a documentary based on the myth of the Blair Witch. Everyone
in this town knows about it, or her. Everyone knows that in the 40's a man
brutally killed children based on he heard voices in his head, which was the
Blair Witch. The three excited and hyped up go to camp out in the woods. 
They hike the trails everyday, and enjoy the fresh air. When they get back to
their tent, and begin to get in for the night, they hear noises, twigs
cracking. Then they find strange artifacts hanging from trees. They hear
voices, screams, laughs, as their food begins to dwindle they are forced to
live under strict conditions. All three of them are scared, not able to
understand what is going on. Their way out is blocked, they find rocks and
other sort of strange things.
"The Blair Witch Project" is a horror movie. But not the type of 'Scream'
movies you expect. This movie is downright scary and original. It is filmed in
the way of a documentary with thier footage and docu footage combined. It
doesn't have any ghosts or witches or anything to jump out at you to scare you.
This film is genuinely scary. And I have to say not to offend anyone, but if
you don't or didn't like this then you didn't understand it. If you thought it
was boring, then you didn't listen. If you thought the ending was bad, then
well nevermind. 
To put it another way: 'The Blair Witch Project' is an instant classic. The
opening message is what we are watching. The footage that was found. But what
we have to tell ourselves while watching this movie is that it is only a movie.
Nothing more, there are actors, actresses, directors and more. While watching
this movie, well no scratch that you don't 'watch' this movie, you expierence
this movie. You are made a character and brought into the woods along with the
students.
This movie is the scariest...no the most horrifying and terrifying movie ever
made. After it is over, you are left there thinking, and after it you are still
thinking. What was that? Who is that? I wonder what did that...These are the
many questions left unanswered. I don't think you will be able to sleep much
after this movie. I don't think you will be able to even think much after this
movie. At least that's from my expierience. See 'The Blair Witch Project' to
learn what it is like to be horrified. Then see it again.....
Reviewed  August 7, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Rated R: violence, sexuality, nudity.
Starring: Anne Heche, Vince Vaughn, Viggo Mortenson, Julianne Moore, William 
H. Macy, Robert Forester, Phillip Baker Hall, Rita Wilson and Mother.
When the word first came out that Hitch's masterpiece "Psycho" was going to 
be remade, everyone put the thoughts in their head that this was the worst 
thing anyone could ever do, how could you fix something that wasn't broken? 
The movie opened in December of '99 to a $10 million dollar opening weekend, 
and soon died out with only $22 million to it's name. A huge flop to a lot of 
peoples minds, and 75% of the people who saw it despised it, 20% of the 
people who saw it, thought it was OK, and the other 5% loved it. It's a 
scene-for-scene pointless remake that is enjoyable in it's own way of a 
homage to the original.
The story we all know, has Marion Crane (played quite well by Anne Heche) who 
is a very well-liked banker, on the run after stealing $400,000 from a 
trusting customer, she ends up at a hotel lost on the side of the highway run 
by an eccentric young man named Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn who is good in his 
role, but over the top at times). Norman invites the girl to stay at the 
hotel, and even invites her to dinner in his din. Norman's mother however 
does not like the fact of a girl in her din with her son, and Marion goes to 
her room for the night, only to be surprised in the shower, getting stabbed 
to death. Now her sister and her boyfriend must investigate her murder and 
find out who killed this young woman with (and if you don't know the twist 
your crazy) a great little twist at the end.
"Psycho" has alot going for it, it has some great performances especially by 
Julianne Moore who plays Lila Crane, Marion's sister. I have always loved 
Julianne Moore's performances and her best so far being in 1997's "Boogie 
Nights" or 1999's "Magnolia". Viggo Mortenson plays the boyfriend but he 
seems quite pulled back and not really giving all he can, which to me I don't 
even think he is a great actor. William H. Macy I will say right now gives 
the best performance as usual, as Detective Arbagast, he is easy going in his 
role and seems to be having a ball playing his character. The other 
performances are very well brought out with some great cameos.
Gus Van Sant's direction is another story, he is a very good director and it 
shows here, the shower scene is quite exquisite and almost seems more intense 
than the original. The biggest flaw in this film is the fact that its scene 
for scene, and nothing has been changed, its like watching a colorized 
version of the original, and at times seems out of place. I do agree with 
people who say it is a pointless movie, because why remake a classic if 
nothing is wrong with it? The original stands out as being one of the best 
horror films ever, and this remake to me tributes to the original, rather 
than trying to top the original. In now way did I ever feel this movie was 
trying to be better than the original, and I went into the theatre thinking 
of a homage rather than a remake.
For all you despisers of this movie, try watching it again and just think 
that Gus Van Sant was trying to make a homage rather than a remake, or top 
the original type movie, because as well all know it will never top the 
original. With some terrific performances, great directing, and some 
suspenseful scenes, "Psycho" is a remake that even though not as good as the 
original, still an enjoyable tribute to the man himself.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 12-20-98

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Rated R: strong violence, gore, language.
Starring: Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Sean William Scott, Kerr Smith, Daniel
Roebuck, Tony Todd.
Running Time: 97 mins
Teen slasher has been noticeable these days. We've had films such as "Scream"
and its 3 sequels, "I know what you did last summer" and its far inferior
"sequel", "Urban Legend" and its sequel. What brought out these teen slashers
is the fact that they are sadly all hits. Even though I liked some of the
films, I did get tired of seeing teens running around getting slashes up, its
been done before and nothing is original. Well nothing could have gotten me
ready for a terrifying film, that I first saw a preview for on "Next Friday".
The trailer truly scared me, and made the film look great, but I knew it would
be just another teen slasher movie. Well I was wrong, you never see the killer
and the film never drops into that teen slasher feel.
The film starts out with a terrifyingly real plane crash, where a group of
students are getting ready to go to France. Aboard the plane Alex Browning
(Devon Sawa) has a dream/vision of the plane crashing in a realistic way.
Everything that happened prior in his dream, happens when he wakes up, and he
goes crazy, getting him and five of his friends kicked off the flight, and one
teacher. When he is back into the lobby he explains what happened in his dream,
to which no one believes, until the plane explodes, and all the students die. A
few months later,  weird things are starting to happen, his friends are
starting to die by someone....something, Alex along with his friends has try
and figure out what is doing this, before it gets them, and he must remember,
he cheated death so death is after him.
The film is directed by James Wong and is fantastic. The thing that I found
best about the movie was the fact that you never saw who was killing these
people, most of which occured on accident in very very inventive ways. Some
brilliant ideas really flow throughout this movie, and I found myself stunned
in my seat about how far it strayed from being a teen slasher film, this is a
real mature adult movie only with a teen cast. The cast is a far cry from being
like others where the performances are wooden, this is a cast that is
definately talented.
Devon Sawa clocks in one great performance as the psychic Alex who can sense
what is going to happen in the future, his character is so well-thought and
Devon brings him out brilliantly, and gives us a character we can both relate
to, and hope we never have to. Ali Larter (who was previously in "House on
Haunted Hill" and "Varsity Blues") gives a great down to earth performance, as
a girl who is an outcast, not very well-known, but very special in her own way.
The rest of the cast includes Kerr Smith, Daniel Roebuck and the always great
Tony Todd round out a great cast.
This is one breathtakingly scary film, that is one of the scariest I have seen.
It's inventiveness never ceases to amaze me, the script is brilliantly written,
and James Wong is a great new director. I definately recommend "Final
Destination" to those who are tired of teen movies, and ready for a hardcore
horror flick.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 3/29/00
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
Rating: * * * * out of * * * *    (* * * * * for NZone)
Starring: Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Marg Heleberger, Cherry
Jones, Peter Coyote, Veanne Cox, Conchata Ferrell.
Directed by: Steven Soderbergh
2000--131 Minutes
Written By Brandon Herring March 17, 2000
So far in the year 2000, we have not had a great movie. So far in the year 2000
only 7 films have gotten *** or more, two films have gotten Zero Stars. I was
starting to give up on movies so far, when I came along this gem, which has
become a huge hit. Julia Roberts is probably my favorite actress in the world,
and starred last year in one of my top 10 favorites "Notting Hill". Roberts was
mostly known for her roles in romantic comedies such as "Pretty Woman" and
"Runaway Bride", now in the year 2000 Roberts comes back in a role much
different from her past, this time she is a tight skirt wearing, foul-mouthed,
sexy paralegal in the first great movie of 2000.
"Erin Brokovich" is the incredibly true story of a young woman (brilliant
played by Julia Roberts) who is the single mother of three, married twice and
divorced twice, living in a run down house with roaches, battling a lawyers
office which happens to be her job, and her love life is on the rocks. This is
the everyday of Erin's life. The film starts out with Erin getting into a nasty
accident, and sueing the guy responsible for hitting her. She ends up working
for this lawyer's office led by Ed Massery (played greatly by Albert Finney).
Erin is hired reluctencly as a paralegal, and ends up investigating a very
serious case in her real estate files, which has to deal with people on this
once piece of land, whose water comes from PG&E, ends up developing cancer
after living on this land, and drinking this water. Erin meets a young woman
played fantastically by Marg Helenberger who is being attacked with a handful
of diseases, and Erin gathers up enough people who in the past have lived on
this land to file a lawsuit. What insues is a uplifting story, and an
incredibly showcase of acting. 
Julia Roberts who starred last summer in one of my favorite movies of all time,
1999's "Notting Hill", has again come through and made another movie that is
howlingly funny, devistatingly sad, and in the end uplifting and powerful that
a tear came to my eye because I felt so good. Julia gives yet another
Oscar-calibur performance, and her portrayal of a single mother here is
priceless. Roberts being not a mother in real life, is so believable that you'd
think she has kids secretly. Her on screen chemistry with the camera is beyond
descriptive words, and only the mind can imagine how good Julia is. Her snappy
dialogue written by Susannah Grant has some brilliantly funny lines, and very
smart words come out of this woman's mouth. Julia and her tightfitting clothes
are another character trait in this film, she is always in cleavage showing,
short tight-fitting skirts that always show off not even enough. She in the end
is powerful, yet subtle, foul-mouthed, yet gentle woman whom we fall in love
with by the time the credits role.
Her supporting actors notably Albert Finney are fantastic, and back up the lead
actress with charisma and charm. Albert Finney plays Erin's boss, and is
incredibly effective in his role. He gives us a believable man, who owns a
business and is having this young woman work for him, which we all know could
not be that easily done. In the end again we fall in love with him as well.
Aaron Eckhart most notable from "In The Company of Men" and "Your Friends &
Neighbors" is an on screen gem playing Erin's gruff, biker boyfriend Robert,
who behind all the facial hair, and ruff and tuff image, is a sweet natured
guy, who falls in love with both her and her kids. 
Directed by Steven Soderbergh who gave us 1998's fantastic "Out of Sight"
strikes gold once again, with this realistic, breathtakingly fresh view into
Erin's world, and the effects it has on Erin's family. Not only does he do such
a good job at being a director, as he does making good movies. If Soderbergh
continues to make movies like this, I will continue to praise movies like this.
When you walk into a movie, and expect the best, and get even more it is a rare
feeling to know that movies like this can come out. Even though only being
March of 2000, I can already tell right now, "Erin Brokovich" is already one of
the best films of 2000, and so far the best movie I have seen of 2000. 
"Sometimes there is so much beauty in the world, I feel like I can't take it,
like my heart is going to cave it"- American Beauty
"He came home"- Halloween
"Things fall down, people look up, and when it rains it pours" Magnolia

Title
Review for Stop Making Sense (1984)
Starring: David Byrne, Chris Frantz, Jerry Harrison, Tina Weymouth, Edna Holt,
Lynn Mabry, Steven Scales, Alex Weir, Bernie Worrell. (All band members)
Unrated contains no offensive material.
Release Date: September 15, 1999 in New York, then spreads throughout the
country after that.
I will admit now, I've never heard of The Talking Heads. In fact I've never
even heard any of their songs, but after watching this brilliant film I wished
I had known more about them before. 
This concert film which is nothing but the group performing before a live
audience (Cut the word which). So you say, well the performers are so good,
especially David Byrne who gives a great performance on stage, and along with
their groundbreaking songs, the whole film remains a classic after 15 years the
film is still recognized and popular.
Jonathan Demme directed the film, which contains sensational editing, amazing
camera shots, and spectacular songs. The Talking Heads were a group between
1976 and 1988, and in 1984 they made this film which was a taped concert of
sorts (featuring) of some of their greatest songs which Include 'Burnin' Down
the House', 'Psycho Killer' and 'Once in a Lifetime'.
What makes 'Stop Making Sense' such a good movie is the fact that it has
excellentcamerawork, that we feel we are actually part of the concert audience,
rather than watching a filmed record of the show. Being remixed in Dolby
Digital sound, it is surely crisp and fresh. The picture is sharp and clear,
and is amazing. The songs are even more amazing, starting with David Byrne the
lead singer, walking out on stage with his boombox and guitar, starts singing
and eventually his whole band and back-up singers appear. 
What makes the film even more interesting is the performances that David Byrne
gets, not by acting but by singing: he lives out the songs and entertains us
while we listen to them. At one point he wears a big suit, that looks like his
head is smaller than the rest of his body, which became his trademark for
several years to follow. 
We get in the feel of the movie as it progresses, the songs made me want to get
up and dance my brains out since they are all good-natured and bright, fun
songs. Some may get bored by 'Stop Making Sense' and want more to happen
besides songs but, the songs are what make the movie. They are the dialogue of
the movie and instead ofDavid talking them he sings them. Brilliant,
innovative, and probably one of the best rock performances I've seen in my
life. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring, September 1, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Rumble Fish (1983)
'Rumble Fish' is one of the best movies ever made, it's ability to movie the
viewer while both entertaining, and fascinating, is just one of the specialties
of the movie. I thought the camera shots, and visual shots were just amazing,
and stunned me. This is the only movie, to which at home, after it was over, I
sat there, didn't move, and after I got out of shocked, I clapped. Just
fantastic.
Matt Dillon plays Rusty James, a young man, who is faced with the shadow of his
brother, and trying to live up to that shadow. He is not sure what his brother
has done, to be so hated in the world they live in, nor can he understand how
he can live up to his brother and be just like him. Rusty James has been living
the life good until his brother, played by Mickey Rourke comes back, and shocks
everyone.
Mickey Rourke (Although some say he's odd), plays his character 'The Motorcycle
boy' quite well, who is the older brother of Rusty James, and has done some bad
stuff in his days, and tries to tell his brother not to repeat those mistakes
he did. But Rusty James wants to be his brother, but fails many times.
Their father, played well by Dennis Hopper, is a drunk, who most of the time is
at the local pub drinking his heart away, and never paying attention to the
kids he has left. He does love them, but loves the alcohol even more. Some
nights he will spend with his kids, and some others he will ignore them. But as
the others is shocked to see that his oldest son is back.
Rusty and his brother, have to overcome the shock of the town, by leaving with
Rusty's friend, and going out of the town, eventually coming in contact with
terror, gangs, and beer. Although it doesn't work completely, ultimately ending
in an abrupt finale, that is both heart wrenching as much as it is compelling.
The characters are very well made out, with none of them being muddled, or
washed out. Matt Dillon and Mickey Rourke give superb performances as the two
brothers on the run from their life. One has a fetish of fish, the other of
life, and trying to figure out what life is. Nicholas Cage, and Dennis Hopper
give excellent supporting cast as does Diane Lane as Matt Dillon's
ex-girlfriend.
Francis Ford Coppola who directed classics such as The Godfather Trilogy, Bram
Stoker's Dracula (1992), Apocalypse Now, and more, strikes this film with a
block of cement almost. He adapted the screenplay from J. Hilton's book, which
also is well-known. Francis does a great job-directing as he does writing, and
I think which makes this film even more the better.
Some may cringe at the fact that the movie is black and white, but to me it
makes it even more authentic, and you get so involved in the story, you dont
even recognize that the movie is in black and white, and some of the sequences
with the fish are in color, and again, your so absorbed in the story, that your
dont even realize that your watching a color sequence. With all these points,
this film deserves all the credit it gets, and gets my pick as one of the best
films ever made. See it, experience it, and relive it over and over. By the
way, this is Matt Dillon's third J. Hilton film, and Francis Ford Coppola's
second (following The Outsiders).

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)

Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2  * * * out of * * * *
Starring: Steven Baker Turner, Tristine Skyler, Kim Director, Erica Leerhsen, 
Jeffrey Donovan, Lanny Flaterhy.
Directed by: Joe Berlinger
Rated R: strong violence, blood, sexuality, nudity, language, drug use.
Running Time: 90 minutes
After the surprise $140 million dollar hit "The Blair Witch Project" a sequel 
was inevitable. Even though 65% of the audience who viewed this masterpiece, 
most hated it. I for one though it was a brilliant piece of art, and it 
literally scared the hell out of me, leaving me in my seat to sit, shaking, 
wondering what I just viewed. After I heard talks of a sequel, I wanted to 
kill whoever was making up the rumors, until I found out they were true, and 
now that the sequel has come out I must say I'm quite surprised at how 
well-made the movie was.
Opening with a clever sequence, of people praising and dissing on "The Blair 
Witch Project" we meet Jeff Patterson, a Blair Witch fantatic who sells stuff 
in his hometown in Maryland, stickmen, blair witch t-shirts, you get the 
point. He takes four people out into the woods on a journey known as "The 
Blair Witch Hunt", Kim, a smart gothic psychic, Erica a Wiccan witch, Tristen 
and Stephen a couple who are obsessed with Blair Witch was well, and Tristen 
is expecting a child, but obviously doesn't want to keep it.
After spending the night in the woods, they wake up to find themselves 
covered in shreds of paper, which is the work of Tristen and Stephen, not 
knowing what they did for five hours, the five people retreat to Jeff's home 
(an old factory) and view the tapes of what they did, what they find out is 
utterly shocking, and surprising, though I thought the film goes into too 
much of a slasher pic type of ending. Until then though, the film is quite 
clever and shocking, and very very gory. What the first film accomplished in 
Hollywood was that you didn't need gore, violence or monsters to scare you.
"Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" is a decieving title, there is no Book of 
Shadows, and the movie really has nothing to do with the first, except for 
Blair Witch herself. Sadly though she does not make a star-studded 
appearance, and really there is not any scares in the film at all, a few 
shlocks here and there, with a pumping rock soundtrack to back it up, but 
narely a scare is in the film. One would have hoped for a better "Book of 
Shadows" but Joe Berlinger does what he can with the film, and has some very 
good direction.
The stars in the first movie were memorable for not having a script, and 
adlibbing most of their stuff, in here the script is written out and it is 
quite obvious, the standout of the film is Kim Director as the gothic girl, 
she takes on her role and takes over the screen in the process. The rest of 
the cast is ok, but they aren't anything compared to Kim. There is some flaws 
in the movie, as well as some plot holes for those who didn't visit the 
website. But all in all "Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" is one to be 
visited, maybe more than once.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 10/27/00

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
Wishmaster
* * * * out of * * * *
Rated R for strong horror violence and gore, and for language.
Wes Craven produced this stylish, well-made, and extremely gory, and great
movie. When I first saw this, my expectations were low, because people had said
it was pretty bad. But I must say, it exceded my expectations, and was a good,
scary, and gory movie. Well-worth the watch, Wishmaster has become to me, a
camp classic, and one of my favorites.
The movie starts out about 3,000 years ago, and gives us a message on what
Djinn's are. What is a Djinn? Read on and you will learn. In the opening
sequence, an ancient king has wished to have the best party in history. Well
the Djinn (Played devilishly good by Andrew Divoff) is best described as a
smarta--, and the wishes he grants backfires on the people who are wishing it.
In this case, all the people at the party come to gruesome deaths, some turn
into lizards, another has his skeleton come completely out of his skin, and his
skeleton walks around attacking people. Another has something coming out of his
stomach, and one gets smacked against the wall. The wizard, comes in and tells
the king to stop before he makes his last wish, which would make the Djinn be
able to take over the world. The wizard takes the jewel (too which the Djinn
lives) and commands he goes back in, he does, and stays there for 3,000 years.
Then we see a statue, being delivered to a man named Raymond Beaumont (Robert
Englund, best known as Freddy Kruegar). He has bought a new statue to put in
his collection at his museum-house. While the statue is being lowered, the
crane operator spills his coffee on the controls, and drops the statue on a man
below, causing it to bust in pieces. One of the construction workers spots a
jewel, and takes it out and puts it in his pocket. 
The man brings the jewel to a museum to which Alexander Amberson (Tammy Lauren)
works. She investigates the jewel, and tries to find out how old the jewel
itself is. She asks her friend Chris Lemmon (Nick Merrit), a jewel anologist to
find out how old, and what kind of jewel it is. When he puts the jewel into the
computer to be analyzed the laser hitting ther jewel causes the jewel to
explode as well as the cpu, and injures Chris. The Djinn is now released, and
asks Chris, if he wants the pain to go away, Chris wishes it away, and it does,
but so does Chris's life. The Djinn is now free to find the one that released
him to which that is Alexandra.
He takes human form as Nathaniel Demerest, and goes out to ask people what they
wish to do or not to do. And if they wish, they die. Say one wishes that his
enemy would get cancer, and he grants his wish, and his enemy dies of cancer. A
woman, wishes that she would have eternal beauty, and turns into a manequinn. 
The Djinn, who was released by Alexandra, makes her see all that he does. If he
kills she sees, if they wish she sees, and has to live it all up. She has to
proctect herself, as well as her sister from this evil Djinn, and try to make
him not take over the world. Nathaniel, then goes to the party to which Raymond
is at, and of course Raymond wishes to have a party that will go down in
history, and he does (I wont spoil it). Alexandra must now, find out how to
defeat this Wishmaster without dying herself, or her friends. Her final thought
of defeating him is brilliant.
As is the movie, I found myself entertained to the limit. I found no flaws, no
gratitous gore, and no dumb story. Andrew Divoff who plays Wishmaster, and
Nathaniel Demerest, does a brilliant performance, and w wicked one at that. And
really gets into his performance, mixing wit with terror. As does Tammy Lauren,
she does a great job as her character, and gets realistically into it. Robert
Englund (Who as always) plays his character well.
As the movie itself? It had some great suspense sequences, most coming toward
the end, and a really high count of graphic violence/gore. But what got me the
most, was how fun the movie was. It was never flawed, never boring, nor was it
stupid. The make-up effects on Andrew Divoff, spectacular. And the gore
effects, with people being ripped open, and one gets his mouth ripped off, this
is definately not for the squeamish. But, But, If you are a horror fan, who
loves fun movies, this is one for you, believe me, I dont think youll be let
down.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring (HorrorMvFn@aol.com

Title
Review for Saving Silverman (2001)
"Saving Silverman" is a good example of a good comedy gone bad. As a love 
story it is good, however as a comedy it falls flat on it's face. I think 
throughout the short 90 minutes I laughed a total of seven times...and those 
were just chuckles at the most! The movie doesn't have the oomph to make it a 
great movie, and doesn't have the script to make it a funny movie.
Wayne Lefessier (Steven Zahn), J.D. McNugent (Jack Black), and Darren 
Silverman (Jason Biggs) have grown up all their lives together, they have 
been best friends forever and vow to stay close till the end. While in a bar 
after doing a show with their band, based on their love of Neil Diamond, 
Darren meets a young woman named Judith (Amanda Peet) whom he instantly falls 
for. Wayne and J.D. however think differently and when Judith tells Darren 
that he can never see his friends again, it's up to Wayne and J.D. to try and 
begin Saving Silverman.
The performances are topnotch and surprisingly, they are what keep the movie 
afloat. Jason Biggs right off the flop "Loser" does an OK job playing 
Silverman, but he is stale and flat at times. Steve Zahn is perfect in the 
role of Wayne Lefessier, and even though the movie is about Silverman, 
Lefessier is really the main character and the narrator of the movie itself. 
Jack Black is well Jack Black, and he does an all right job as J.D. but he 
isn't as funny as he has been in the past. Amanda Peet plays the ultimate 
bitch as Judith, and Neil Diamond plays Neil Diamond (he's better at singing 
than acting). Anyway the performances in the film are good, but it's too bad 
the script isn't.
Speaking of script, Hank Nelkan's choppy script is not only badly written, 
but not funny enough even for an episode of Sesame Street. The trailer for 
the movie, as with most movies gives away everything that happens in the 
movie, especially the funniest parts. Somewhere "Saving Silverman" was meant 
to be a good movie, and it could have been, but alas in the end it wasn't.
Dennis Dugan's direction is all right, he adds a few directorial touches here 
and there, nothing special being a simple comedy. "Saving Silverman" is a 
perfectly bad movie in more ways than one. It has a great cast, a good 
director and a sweet story...it's just too bad it has a bad script and is all 
together a bad movie. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 3-11-00.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Voices.....Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda Richardson, Tony Haygarth, Jane 
Horrocks, Timothy Spall, Phil Daniels, Lynn Ferguson, Benjamin Whitrow.
Running Time: 85 minutes
Sometimes there are animated wonders. The year 1999 had the amazing "Toy 
Story 2", 1998 had the classic "Mulan", and going all the way back to the 
original "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs" animation has come a long way. 
However let's not get on the subject of Disney films, but rather Dreamworks 
Animated Movies, whose films include 1998's "The Prince of Egypt", and 2000's 
flop "The Road to El Dorado" has now come out with a new instant classic 
"Chicken Run", a brilliant, funny well animated movie that is worthy of all 
the praise it can get.
Taking place in the 1950's, "Chicken Run" is about a big group of chickens, 
whose farm they live on belonging to the Tweedy's is a bit like a Poultry 
Holocaust setting, they try and try their hardest to get out of this pin, 
because if they do not lay eggs anymore, they die and become friend chicken. 
The main character Ginger (Julia Swalha) is the young chicken who is the one 
that is destined to get out and try if her tries fail. She tries many times, 
but is locked away in a dumpster for a few days to return back to the pin and 
do it all over again. One day a gift from heaven comes, the suave Rocky the 
Rooster (voiced by Mel Gibson) who literally flies over their pin, saves the 
day by trying to teach the girls how to fly out of this coop. 
However Mr. and Mrs. Tweedy have something else on their minds, and the 
chickens must get out of the pin and escape or die frying. Along the way they 
have some hilarious misadventures, with sweet and clever dialogue and very 
well developed characters for chickens that is. The voices also are a 
standout with Julia Sawalha being the best out of all of them. She brings out 
her voice and makes it full force as well as hilarious. The supporting 
chickens are funny as well, that at times had me rolling so hard. Mel Gibson 
is a great voice too and fits Rocky the Rooster quite well. Miranda 
Richardson does the spooky character voice for Mrs. Tweedy and sounds very 
nice, as well as mean. Tony Haygarth plays the cowardly Mr. Tweedy who really 
isn't as mean as Mrs. Tweedy is.
The animation on the film is beyond amazing, the claymation used in this film 
is colorful, brilliant and fantastically done. You can really tell in some 
scenes that alot of work (3 years) was put into this film. In the end, 
however it shows wonderfully. The movement of these chickens is smooth and 
makes those old Gumby episodes look like mush. Even with Disneys $200m flop 
'Dinosaur' I would have to pick 'Chicken Run' as having the best animation so 
far this year, not because of the fact that its animated, but because of the 
fact of all the work that was put into this film in the past three years and 
$42 million dollars later. 
The film a wonderful children's movie that kids will sit and enjoy, laugh at 
and be entertained by. Its direction, voices and story are so brought out 
well, that this may be one of the best animated films I've seen. It is 
certainly one of the best films of 2000. There really isn't any flaws in the 
film, which is a rare occasion in Hollywood these days. Last year we had 
"American Beauty" another Dreamworks film, and in 1998 we had "Saving Private 
Ryan" yet another Dreamworks film. If this is the case, I hope Dreamworks 
puts out more films like "Chicken Run". Because as long as they do I will 
certainly be there to watch them.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Rated: R for some language and nudity. 
Starring: Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Paul Giamatti, Courtney Love, Jerry Lawler,
Jeff Conway, Marilu Henner, Judd Hirsch, Lorne Michaels, Carol Cane,
Christopher Lloyd, Norm McDonald, Caroline 
Reah, David Letterman, Paul Shaffer.
"Man on the Moon" which is based on the life of Andy Kaufman one of the
greatest comedy acts of our time is that of a brilliant movie. It not only
introduces a generation who didn't know Kaufman, but it also introduces us to
the real Kaufman himself, not a comedian, not a goof, but a real person.
Throughout the film we get to know Kaufman as a person not as a stage act. Jim
Carrey who plays Andy Kaufman himself gives a brilliant performance that
screams Oscar to the highest octave.
The film starts with Andy talking to us about how they edited out the parts of
the film and it isn't the way he wanted it to be. So the credits role and the
screen goes blank. Audiences will probably wonder what the heck is going on and
Andy's head pops on screen and explains that if the people left then they just
didn't get his sense of humor. Then he introduces us to his life...as a young
boy he always wanted to be before an audience...always wanted to entertain,
always wanted to sing. Then we cut to Andy singing in a nightclub, not doing a
very good job Andy is fired and forced to find work elsewhere. When performing
on a stage and impersonating Elvis he is spotted by George Shapiro who asks
Andy where he comes up with these things. Later on George tells Andy that he
has been offered to star in a TV sitcom entitled "Taxi" as long as he plays his
foreign character. Andy hesitates but agrees and starts a long-running career.
Andy gets in trouble here and there and pulls many practical jokes and meets
the love of his life (Courtney Love) who is always great in the movies she
plays in. Throughout Andy's life he was known as a brilliant comedian and
horrible person but which was he brilliant or horrible? During the movie we are
forced to make a decision until the end which is heart wrenching and at the
same time thought-provoking and makes us ask ourselves: Was Andy really a good
person, or was he just another comedian. In my opinion I say andy was a good
normal person and all of his jokes and pranks were just part of his act.
Milos Forman does a terrific job of making Andy come to the screen and he
directs with skill and style. Jim Carrey who gave a terrific performance in
1998's "The Truman Show" yet again shows us that he can give good dramatic and
believeable performances that scream Oscar. He is very funny and brings Andy to
a younger generation. To me I think Jim might have just out did his Truman Show
performance and in my case gives the second best performance of the year
(Behind Michael Duncan in The Green Mile).
The supporting cast isn's a letdown either and all of them Courtney Love, Danny
DeVito, and Paul Giamatti all support Andy and give stand-out performances
especially by Courtney Love. The screen play written by Scott Alexander and
Larry Karaszewski   is very funny but at the same time thoughtful and
realistic. It would not surprise me if "Man on the Moon" gets Oscar nods for
acting or picture and it comes out at not better time than Christmas. When you
see "Man on the Moon" you almost become Andy in a way and see the world through
Andy's eye's instead of the movies eyes.
Around the middle of the movie I felt cherished to get to see such a touching
film that after it was over I cheered and clapped. The theme song by R.E.M.
adds much to the excitement and don't be surprised if you eyes fill with tears
by being both sad and happy. Let's just hope that by making this movie Andy
Kaufman's spirit will stay alive and that everyone will remember him as a comic
genius. Even though I wasn't alive when Andy was famous I can tell by this
movie that it would have been a pleasure to know Andy Kaufman...and know that
he was just a regular guy.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring December 20, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
WARNING: May contain slight mild spoilers. 
Rated: R for intense violence/gore, some strong sexuality and language. 
Starring: Arnold Schwarzeneggar, Robin Tunney, Rod Stieger, Gabriel Byrne. 
We go into a movie theater, boom! the lights go down, our hearts race, we go
through ten minutes of preview and finally the movie we've been waiting to see
for a long time comes on. We sit there, watch in disbelief that this movie is
as bad as it is. Why shouldn't I have know what I was getting myself into.
Again like this past summers hit "Stigmata", "End of Days" may be worse. It's
not like this is any kind of original idea, it just throws in some "Rosemary's
Baby", along with "The Devil's Advocate" a little "Exorcist" and some
"Stigmata" here and there. Whala you have "End of Days" a movie that is
extremely disappointing and by the previews made it look terrific. Sadly but
truly again like most recent films, all the good parts are in the trailers. 
The plot which is very confusing at times is also very ludicrous and the movie
is destined to be a hit in the first weekend, and flop in the next. Jericho
Cane (Arnold Schwarzneggar in hit typical macho role) is a cop who finds out
that he is chosen to track down Satan (Living in Gabriel Byrnes body) and stop
him from impregnating Christine York (Robin Tunney) because if he does, and she
gives birth all existence as we know it will cease to exist. He has to do this
before it turns into the year 2000, and strangely he's trying to fight him 5
minutes before 2000 comes. He seeks help from the Catholic church and help from
Rod Stieger (in a terrific role) and tries to save this girl leading to an
ending that's satisfying, but turns into a typical action movie. That's pretty
much it on plot. It does have the razzle and dazzle of a great action movie,
and with the 100m dollar budget parts seem to show it, parts you have to wonder
where all the money went. 
As for Arnie? Good role, OK performance. I think since he is getting a little
older he is held back a lot of his stunts. The thing that disappointed me was
the fact that there was nothing to the film. In the trailers it looks like a
good scary, action film and ends up being a boring, long and preposterous drama
that leads into something else that leaves us with questions. Gabriel Byrnes
(who ironically played a priest in "Stigmata") here plays Satan and gives a
good performance but again seems held back and not into his character. Two
years back Al Pacino gave a terrific performance in the fun "The Devil's
Advocate" and here it seems like the idea of him is in the character also.
Robin Tunney (great performance as always) plays Satan's main person whom he
wants to impregnate to carry his child. Of course Rod Stieger gives another
great performance which really isn't nothing new. 
The direction by Peter Hyams is at times a bit overblown, though not nearly as
the visual style was in "Stigmata". Here we are given great camera work, and
some great scenes that are terrifically directed but sadly just don't work in
this movie. The script written by Andrew Marlowe has a few witty lines, but
again the movie is all style and no substance and by the ending finale climax I
was ready to go home. Only a few things work here and those are a few of the
performances, the writing and visual style, but the storyline and the finished
product don't work as well. 
The sad thing is that "End of Days" had so many things going for it. The plot
could have been more organized, the action scenes could have been more brainy
and less mind-numbing. At times it seems like "Armageddon" and started to get
old and tiresome. Hollywood is running out of ideas bad, and like I've always
said before needs new ones. Even with its 100m budget "End of Days" is less
than pleasing. In fact the 100m dollar budget is at least 30m over, and easily
could have had a 70m budget. 
Maybe I sound crazy, but I am really looking forward to the new Exorcist film,
and hope that they make it as good as the original. We need to get new ideas
and stop recycling old ones just to make money at the box-office. We need to
get more films like "The Blair Witch Project" that could scare people to death,
while people thinking well what exactly is scaring them and how do I know that
it is in fact The Blair Witch. Overblown effects, stupid and thin plot-line,
good performances, disappointing....umm yup those pretty much describe "End of
Days". 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring November 23, 1999. 
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Shrek (2001)

Shrek
Rating: * * * * out of * * * *
Rated PG: mild language, crude humor, some sexual innuendo.
Starring the voices of...Mike Myers, Eddie Murphy, Cameron Diaz, John Lithgow.
Directed by: Andrew Adamson, Vicky Jenson
Back in 1998 Dreamworks unveiled their first computer animated movie "Antz". 
The film was critically acclaimed, and went on to gross almost $100m dollars 
at the domestic box office. Again in 1998 they released their traditional 
animated film "The Prince of Egypt" and it named an instant classic, and 
became a huge hit as well. On a winning streak, they released "The Road to El 
Dorado" and it wasn't as big as they hoped, but still did ok, then they had 
the fantastic "Chicken Run" in the summer. Now in 2001 Dreamworks has 
released what I can safely name, one of the top five best animated films.
Shrek (Mike Myers) is about a loving, green Ogre who lives in the woods of 
Duloc by himself. Surrounded by fairy tale characters, he hopes somehow he 
would escape from everyone. The ruler of Duloc is the short, heartless Lord 
Farquaad (John Lithgow), who is offering a reward to all the fairy tale 
creatures, if they are captured and arrested. Of course many of the owners 
turn them in for gold and silver, but one of those creatures is Donkey (Eddie 
Murphy). A regular donkey, except he talks and has a definite attitude, after 
his owner tries to disown him, he escapes into the woods, and runs into 
Shrek. Lord Farquaad however, has different plans and makes all the fairy 
tale creatures in the woods near Shrek's house. To get his property back, and 
his life back Shrek must rescue Princess Fiona (Cameron Diaz) so Lord 
Farquaad can be a king. Shrek wants his property back, but he never thought 
he would fall in love with Princess Fiona.
"Shrek" is such an amazing film, that while watching it you can't help but 
just smile the entire time and wonder why that other production company can't 
make movies like this. The animated graphics are so great, that they look 
every bit of realistic. I saw previews for this film all last year, and I 
thought to myself wow, what a great movie this will be. I must say I was not 
disappointed at all, and the film is the best of 2001 so far, and will go 
down on my best of 2001 list at the end of the year.
The voice talents are brilliant as well, with the comic genius Mike Myers. In 
the past he has been a Wayne, an Austin, and a person married to an ax 
murderer. Now he is Shrek, not only does he do the voice talent...but he IS 
Shrek. With his Irish accent, and he lovable personality, Shrek becomes a 
friend to the audience and warms your heart.
Eddie Murphy who showed his voice talent in 1998s "Mulan" does another bang 
up job here, and he is the comic relief in the film. The tones of his voice, 
the lines he utters, and the jokes he gives, he even outdoes the comic genius 
of Robin Williams in "Aladdin". The always beautiful Cameron Diaz gives the 
voice of Princess Fiona and she does a great job as well. She is very funny, 
and her character fits her to a T. Of course the best supporting voice is 
John Lithgow, who is personally one of my favorite actors. He as the bad guy 
Lord Farquaad does a great job in being both sinister and funny at the same 
time.
At times I was so amazed by the computer graphics, that you can't help but 
just start looking at backgrounds. There is many hidden jokes in the film, 
and even reflections of light on the screen like a camera. "Shrek" is a 
definite kid film, but not just a kid film for it is a film for the entire 
family to enjoy. There are many adult jokes in the film that the kids won't 
get, but the parents will be laughing. Believe me though, everyone will be 
laughing the entire way through.
In the end, "Shrek" gives a very important message to it's audience to enjoy 
and be who you are. Everybody out there is beautiful in their own way, even 
though it may be inside. There's not many words that can praise "Shrek" 
enough, but my words to you is to stop what you are doing and see this movie 
now. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 5-18-01.
 reviews by Brandon Herring 

Title
Review for Wishmaster 2: Evil Never Dies (1999) (V)
Wishmaster 2: Evil Never Dies
* * * out of * * * *
Rated R for strong horror violence and gore, strong language, and some
sexuality.
Wishmaster 2 is a sequel, that isnt as good as the original, but deserves all
the credit it can get. A well-written, imaginative, scary, gory, and well-acted
horror movie. With some great sequences of horor action, and humor, I have to
say this is a credible sequel.
After a robbery of an art museum, and the breaking of the statue the Wishmaster
was condemed to in the first, the burglar finds the jewel and takes it out. But
as we know, whoever releases him, gets to take him home to mommy and daddy.
Well in this one it's kinda like that, but after the burglar releases the
Djinn, she is a she named Morgana (Holly Fields) who isnt the purest girl
around. The Djinn (Andrew Divoff, once again in a great role) takes human form,
and confesses to the crime of what she did.
He goes to jail, only to learn he need 1001 souls to take over the world. Like
the first, Morgana can see if he kills anyone, and what his world when they die
looks like. A terrifying one at that. When she learns of what is happening, and
what has happened, she does her homework, and discovers what a Djinn is, and
how to destory it. With her wild look and attitude, she has to purify herself,
and team up with a priest to destroy and condemn the Djinn to his jewel for
good.
With some terrific performances, and a funny one where a man wants his lawyer
for (beep) himself, the Djinng grants this wish, and the lawyer does so but not
in the way u think. Very funny, I laughed for along time. Andrew Divoff plays
his character very well once again, and has a great time doing it. Holly Fields
(Im sure in her debut) does a credible job as the tortured woman, who has to
destroy it.
Although this film is nowhere near as good as the first, it does have a little
more plot than the first, but unlike the first, there isnt much gore till the
end, to which is a showstopping finale, and an incredible one at that. It does
however have more special effects, and gore towards the end, and stays
entertaining through out with great humor, and lots of style, to make this a
good sequel, as far as sequels go.
I must say, unlike again the first, this one went into more of the Djinn is a
demon, to which he's not, hes an evil genie, whos granting backfires, lol. But
dont let me fool you he is evil, and bad too. One big thing i noticed with this
one, was that the Djinn was more elaborately made, and had more spikes,
circles, and gadgets on him. He did however look more scary, and talked with a
scratchier voice. But watch the movie for yourself, if u didnt like the first u
wont like this, if u loved the first you will. Its not as good, but still worth
the watch.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring (HorrorMvFn@aol.com)

Title
Review for Pokémon: The Movie 2000 (2000)
Around the end of 1998, a Japanese cartoon came to the USA television, and 
really wasn't that big. In fact not many people even knew what Pokemon was, 
but in 1999 it hit big with kids and adults alike, and became one of the 
biggest franchises and merchandise seller of all time. In fact it even 
spawned a big screen adventure Pokemon: The First Movie which for what it 
was, wasn't all that bad. It grossed $31 million in its opening weekend, and 
went on to make almost $90 million. Fans thought it was great and now is a 
second movie in the Pokemon craze, "Pokemon: The Movie 2000" which is far 
inferior to the original animated movie. 
First up is the plot, which there really isn't much of, in fact the plot what 
there is: A bad guy trying to destroy the ancient never before seen pokemon, 
Lugia, is about it, except the fact that Ash Kethcum the worlds best pokemon 
trainer must try and stop him before he destroys this one pokemon forever. 
Well there you go, of course Ash is followed by his friends Misty, Brock, 
Gary and his pokemon friends, Pikachu, Squirtle, Charizard, the usual. Even 
though the first movie wasn't a great film, it was definately an enjoyable 
well-made movie with an actual thin storyline. This new movie however is 
nothing but garbage, there is nothing good to it storywise, and its only good 
thing comes from some plush animation and colors. 
Compared to the first film, this movie is awfully bland, from its opening 
titles, to the end titles it tries its best to work, but fails miserably at 
every corner. The characters are 1-dimensional, the story thin as chicken 
broth, and the writing very lame. Even the so called action scenes are 
extremely lame, and falls before it even gets a chance to go. The voices even 
aren't that good and almost feels like the stars don't want to be there, like 
they can tell that this is an extremel bad movie. Which it certainly is. 
The film has one thing going for it and that is the animation, although not 
up to Disney standards, it is still very good with some interesting CGI's and 
very colorful animation, the colors jump out at you very fast, and seem very 
nicely put on film. Why a film this bad got such a good treatment with its 
animation is still a question to be answered, hopefully Pokemon 3 next year 
will be much better than this trash. For now watch the first one. Its much 
much better. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Brandon+Herring

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Rated: R for graphic horror violence and gore, and some sexuality. (And TONS of
heads)
Starring: Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Miranda Richardson, Casper Van Dien,
Michael Gambon, Christopher Walken, Christopher Lee, Martin Landau.
Only Tim Burton could to it: Make a big-budgeted horror flick based on the
classic tale by Washington Irving....and make it great. 'Sleepy Hollow' works
on so many levels that in the middle of the movie, I had a huge smile on my
face and thought 'Man this is awesome!'. Of course most of you know the Legend
of Sleepy Hollow and the book by Washington Irving which has always been one of
my favorites. TIm Burton directs with such skill that he has created one of the
most beautiful films put on print.
The movie opens with a creepy and scary little montage of the Headless
Horseman's first victim. From there on we meet Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp) New
York's constable who is sent in my the judge of the town to Sleepy Hollow where
many people have been losing something there. Here in Sleepy Hollow he stays
with the Van Tassel's. He hears the story of the headless horseman and does not
really know what to believe, he meets the Van Tassel's daughter Katrina
(Christina Ricci), who's mother and father are Lady Van Tassel (Miranda
Richardson) and Baltus Van Tassel (Michael Gambon). He really doesn't believe
in the fairy tales of the headless horseman until he himself has an encounter
with him which scares him out of his wits. He however sets out to find the
headless horseman, and for once and for all stop him from killing
again....before he becomes the next victim. 
I must say the best things about this movie are: Johnny Depp's wonderfully
comical performance which he does so good it would almost surpass his Edward
Scissorhand's performance. Christina Ricci seems to also give one of her best
performances to date with strong back-up from Miranda Richardson (always good)
and Michael Gambon. I think the strongest thing of the movie however is the
Headless Horseman himself. Part CGI part man in suit, he is nothing more than
astonishing. He looks incredibly like he has no head, and when you see him a
chill goes down your spine. When he rides his horse its very creepy and when he
chops off someone's head it really does make you scared. For the person who
plays the Headless Horseman he was well-cast and very scary when they tell how
he died. 
Astonishingly enough this isn't the kids story it was before. This is a very
mature film that has so much smartness and cleverness in it, that you have to
wonder why it could not have been made before. It has a dark, creepy atmosphere
and a beautiful setting with incredible costumes. The whole film has a sort of
gothic feel to it, and may be too dark for some people. It is also incredibly
gory and bloody with over twenty beheadings, all resulting in bloody messes.
The beheadings are also very graphic and only one or two are off screen. The
violence and gore may not appeal to everyone so I am just trying to warn you so
you know about it. For those fans and even non-fans of the horror genre I don't
think you will be disappointed.
The directing was also incredible and Tim Burton did just like he did with
Batman and gives it a special touch to be something you didn't think it would
be. He did a great job with shadowing and in the end it's very surprising and
satisfying. One flaw was some slow parts in the movie and one scene that went
on forever, but besides that 'Sleepy Hollow' doesn't have much wrong with it.
The performances are all strong  (except Casper Van Dien YUCK!)as is the clever
writing with a surprising amount of comedy.
Even though the story has been done many times before, this one seems to the be
the best of them all. The 65m dollar budget shows quite clearly and in the end
pays off. It is a beautiful film, with some amazing camerawork, along with the
neat little opening titles. The film is very intense, with some downright scary
moments that had me holding on to my arm chair. 'Sleepy Hollow' does have a few
changes in it than the movie did and adds some surprising twists especially in
the end, and the person who plays The Headless Horseman was quite scary and
well-cast.
'Sleepy Hollow' will go down as a new classic in the horror genre, and shall
not be remade anymore. I would not be surprised if this movie is a hit with
both the young and old crowd. The movie is all entertaining, scary, funny and
gory. It has a touch of this and a touch of that and should have something to
impress or please someone. TIm Burton gives us a great film worthy of the
rating above. With its creepy atmosphere, its graphic violence and witty comedy
'Sleepy Hollow' is nothing but a great movie.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring November 18, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
When I first heard of the pairing of mega-stars Brad Pitt and Julia Roberts, 
I thought wow...that really is a terrible decision. Then the trailer came on, 
and I was shocked, the film actually looked good! So now that I've watched it 
what can I say? Great entertainment, memorable characters, very funny, main 
flaw: 20 minutes overlong.
Jerry Walbach (Brad Pitt) has a problem, he is told to go to Mexico to get a 
prized antique gun known as The Mexican if he wants to live, for a dirty 
crimelord he once worked for. His beautiful if sometimes bitchy girlfriend 
Samantha Barzel (Julia Roberts) has just broken up with him, and is on her 
way to Vegas. Jerry however doesn't have it we good, in Mexico he finds the 
kid who has The Mexican gun, but once the kid is shot accidentally in the 
head Jerry is a target, with many many people knowing what he has. Meanwhile 
in Las Vegas Samantha isn't having the best time as well, she's slightly 
depressed and after she relieves herself in the bathroom she is greeted by a 
bad guy who is then greeted by another man. After this man shoots him several 
times, he takes Samantha and drives off with her in her car.
Leroy (James Gandolfini off "The Sopranos" fame) is the kidnapper, and has 
taken Samantha due to her relationship (she once) had with her (ex) boyfriend 
Jerry. He wants to know where Jerry is, and where that gun is as well. Back 
in Mexico, Jerry's car is stolen as well as the gun that was inside the glove 
box, not having the best of luck he calls up his friend (J.K. Simmons) to 
come down and give him a hand. As Jerry and Samantha are both having their 
problems, we get to see how they resolve them, and in the end who really gets 
The Mexican.
Gore Verbinski director of the the 1997 hit "Mouse Hunt" which was a somewhat 
clever and funny film, he has a lot of talent running around this film. Brad 
Pitt (whose best performance to me is still 1999's "Fight Club) is set in 
goofy mode, and is very funny and engaging. Along with him is the always 
great Julia Roberts who looks different with her short, shagged hair make a 
great pair. The best pairing in the film however is Julia and Tony Soprano 
himself James Gandolfini. Even as a bad guy, Leroy is a sweet and funny 
character. What seems as a movie that is supposed to be a pairing of Julia 
and James, the movie takes a quick 180 and throughout an hour and a half, 
they aren't even on screen together!
The cleverly written script by J.H. Wyman is foul-mouthed, fast and furious. 
What surprised me was the comedy in the film, I knew it'd be funny but where 
were times when I was laughing pretty hard! I had just one major problem with 
"The Mexican" and that is the overlong 2 hour 3 minute running time, about 
110 minutes into the film, I got squirmy in my chair. 
So far in 2001, its been a good year and "The Mexican" I can add to that. 
It's a fun, rollicking, clever ride that is great from start to finish. For 
all those fans of Julia and Brad I definitely recommend this, and hope they 
do more movies together.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Voices.....Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda Richardson, Tony Haygarth, Jane 
Horrocks, Timothy Spall, Phil Daniels, Lynn Ferguson, Benjamin Whitrow.
Running Time: 85 minutes
Sometimes there are animated wonders. The year 1999 had the amazing "Toy 
Story 2", 1998 had the classic "Mulan", and going all the way back to the 
original "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs" animation has come a long way. 
However let's not get on the subject of Disney films, but rather Dreamworks 
Animated Movies, whose films include 1998's "The Prince of Egypt", and 2000's 
flop "The Road to El Dorado" has now come out with a new instant classic 
"Chicken Run", a brilliant, funny well animated movie that is worthy of all 
the praise it can get.
Taking place in the 1950's, "Chicken Run" is about a big group of chickens, 
whose farm they live on belonging to the Tweedy's is a bit like a Poultry 
Holocaust setting, they try and try their hardest to get out of this pin, 
because if they do not lay eggs anymore, they die and become friend chicken. 
The main character Ginger (Julia Swalha) is the young chicken who is the one 
that is destined to get out and try if her tries fail. She tries many times, 
but is locked away in a dumpster for a few days to return back to the pin and 
do it all over again. One day a gift from heaven comes, the suave Rocky the 
Rooster (voiced by Mel Gibson) who literally flies over their pin, saves the 
day by trying to teach the girls how to fly out of this coop. 
However Mr. and Mrs. Tweedy have something else on their minds, and the 
chickens must get out of the pin and escape or die frying. Along the way they 
have some hilarious misadventures, with sweet and clever dialogue and very 
well developed characters for chickens that is. The voices also are a 
standout with Julia Sawalha being the best out of all of them. She brings out 
her voice and makes it full force as well as hilarious. The supporting 
chickens are funny as well, that at times had me rolling so hard. Mel Gibson 
is a great voice too and fits Rocky the Rooster quite well. Miranda 
Richardson does the spooky character voice for Mrs. Tweedy and sounds very 
nice, as well as mean. Tony Haygarth plays the cowardly Mr. Tweedy who really 
isn't as mean as Mrs. Tweedy is.
The animation on the film is beyond amazing, the claymation used in this film 
is colorful, brilliant and fantastically done. You can really tell in some 
scenes that alot of work (3 years) was put into this film. In the end, 
however it shows wonderfully. The movement of these chickens is smooth and 
makes those old Gumby episodes look like mush. Even with Disneys $200m flop 
'Dinosaur' I would have to pick 'Chicken Run' as having the best animation so 
far this year, not because of the fact that its animated, but because of the 
fact of all the work that was put into this film in the past three years and 
$42 million dollars later. 
The film a wonderful children's movie that kids will sit and enjoy, laugh at 
and be entertained by. Its direction, voices and story are so brought out 
well, that this may be one of the best animated films I've seen. It is 
certainly one of the best films of 2000. There really isn't any flaws in the 
film, which is a rare occasion in Hollywood these days. Last year we had 
"American Beauty" another Dreamworks film, and in 1998 we had "Saving Private 
Ryan" yet another Dreamworks film. If this is the case, I hope Dreamworks 
puts out more films like "Chicken Run". Because as long as they do I will 
certainly be there to watch them.

Title
Review for I Woke Up Early the Day I Died (1998)
Starring: Billy Zane, Christina Ricci, Sandra Bernhard, Tippi Hendred, Andrew
McCarthy, Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Nicollette Sheridan, Steven Weber, Ann
Magnuson, John Ritter, Rick Schroder, Will Patton, Ron Perlman and many more.
Unrated contains violence and brief nudity.
There have been bad films in recent years: 'Mr. Magoo' was by far the worst ever
made, the spectacularly bad 'Blue In The Face', the horrible 'Baby Genuises'
and now 'I Woke Up Early The Day I Died'. It may not however be the worst movie
made but it certainly ranks as one bad movie. The film's acting (if that's what
you want to call it) is well mediocre to me. Loaded with a sensational cast you
would think that the cast would at least save the film a bit, boy was I wrong.
After escaping from a mental institution 'The Thief' played by Billy Zane goes
out in the real world and finds that it is pretty harsh and gritty. He turns to
burglary to survive, robs a loan back, kills the loan officer and runs with
thousands. A country-wide man hunt is on for him to catch him and bring him
down. He ends up in a cemetery where he puts his money in a coffin to keep it
for later, comes back and realizes that someone took it and put it somewhere.
Now he is determined to kill all the visitors at the funeral earlier that day
until he gets his money back, ultimately leading to a finale that is less that
satisfying.
A film which was based on a 'long-lost' script by Ed Wood, I have only one
question: No dialogue, only music and movement where exactly is the point? The
film moves along at a rather slow pace, but does have one advantage: the
soundtrack which is catchy and vibrant except the first song which can be
offensive to some. It opens with a fun, innovative opening credits sequence and
quickly goes downhill after that.
Some of the low points are when 'The Thief' steals a woman's purse, and then
she faints, Sandra Bernhard as a dancer and Tippi Hendren as a deaf woman whom
'The Thief' kills to the music of 'Psycho'. Come on people get some new ideas
already! What's even worse is that the film has no plot at all. Well to a
certain extent it does, but who cares by the time the middle of the film
arrives we're bored out of our mind and ready for something fun and exciting to
happen.
'I Woke Up Early The Day I Died' is a perfectly bad film. It shows us how low
filmmakers get sometimes just when desperate to make a movie. Even with the
huge cast talent, the film is a waste of my time and certainly a waste of
yours.
Reviewed September 9, 1999 by Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
Rated: PG-13 for sexual innuendo and language.
Starring: Kirsten Dunst, Eliza Dushku, Jesse Bradford, Gabrielle Union.
Directed by: Peyton Reed
Teen movies became somewhat bothersome in the past two years, we've had so 
many with "10 Things I Hate About You", "Never Been Kissed", and "She's All 
That" just to name a few, plus three flops that came out this year. The bad 
thing about these films is that they follow the same teen movie routine: Boy 
and girl in high school, boy fights with girl, girl gets mad at boy, boy goes 
to prom and makes up with girl and then a bubble-gum pop song plays at the 
end. I had alot of hope for this movie, and to my surprise I was not 
disappointed. "Bring It On" has a great cast of female characters who bring 
out the clever dialogue in a great fashion. The chemistry they have on-screen 
together is so much fun. 
Torrence Shipman (Kirsten Dunst) has just been elected Head Cheerleader of 
the Rancho Carne High School. Her duty is to make the best squad out there 
and win the National Finals for the sixth time in a row. She has even 
recruited a new cheerleader Missy (played greatly by Elize Dushku), who has 
the moves, looks and attitude all in one. While watching practice Missy 
notices something with the routine they do, and takes Torrence on a ride to 
an inner-city school: East Compton High, where Torrence witnesses that the 
Clovers have the same moves they do, except way better. Torrence learns that 
Big Red, their first head cheerleader had been videotaping these routines and 
copying them and winning the finals. Outraged, Torrence must take her squad 
to new lengths to win this competition, she has to get new moves, new music 
and a new routine. Of course along the way, they have the misadventures any 
cheerleader would have if in this situaton. Totally.
One thing I noticed about "Bring It On" is that it doesn't take itself 
seriously. It's a bright, lightweight, funny teen comedy that any person, 
regardless of age, sex or race can enjoy. It doesn't overly expose young teen 
girls (note that locker room scene) and contains some surprisingly realistic 
moments. The acting especially by Eliza Dushku and Kirsten Dunst is first 
rate for a teen comedy. They bring out their characters with style and seem 
to be having a great time making this movie. The direction by Peyton Reed 
really shows in the cheering scenes, these are some greatly choregraphed and 
directed scenes. 
The cleverly written script was done by Jessica Bendinger is written with 
humor and even heart. At times I found myself almost dancing (almost) in my 
chair due to the fact that this movie is so fun, its almost crazy. However 
aside from the mostly good facts of the film, there is also the bad things. 
#1. Is the predictability, we pretty much know who is gonna win, but if you 
don't know I will not spoil it for you. #2. Is that some of the cheerleaders 
are highly cliched and shown as brainless bimbos (no offense to cheerleaders 
reading out there) and #3. Is the love story that goes on between two of the 
main characters, it was extremely under plotted and would have added a much 
more expansive atmosphere to the movie.
Aside from these flaws, "Bring It On" has more plusses than it does minuses. 
You can't find a teen movie these days that stays close to teen lives, 
especially PG-13 teen movies. The acting, directing and writing is all 
satisfactory and the group 'Blaque' appears on the Clovers squad and they do 
a great job supporting the cast. If your heading out on a movie right now and 
don't know which one to see, if your in the mood for fun see "Bring It On". 
You might be disappointed, but I know I sure enjoyed myself.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 9/12/00.

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)
Rated PG: mild language, slapstick violence.
Starring: Rene Russo, Jason Alexander, Robert De Niro, Randy Quaid, Kel 
Mitchell, Piper Perabo, Kenan Thompson, John Goodman, David Alen Grier, 
Jeaneane Garafalo, Whoopi Goldberg.
Thirty-five years ago, "The Bullwinkle Show" was a big hit on televisions. 
Kids would wake up early just to watch the show. Heck when I was little I 
even used to watch the show alot. Yes Moose and Squirrel was the big thing, 
they were popular, made money had tons of fans and was in the lap of luxury. 
Thirty-five years is however a long time, and since then Rocky and Bullwinkle 
really hasn't been very famous, until the year 2000 when Universal releases a 
$80 million budgeted movie, starring Rocky and Bullwinkle. This isn't however 
the Rocky and Bullwinkle you remember, this time they are in the real world 
in an adventure to stop Fearless Leader from taking over the World.
 The movie starts out telling us how Rocky and Bullwinkle has been living off 
re-runs of the show on TV. Bullwinkle has written a letter to the President 
about getting the tress grown back where they live in cartoon land. When 
Natasha, Boris and Fearless Leader are pulled through a television set by 
Jeanane Garofalo, Fearless Leader sets out to take over the world, by making 
a television station called RBTV (really bad TV) which when patrons will 
watch the shows and turn them into mindless walking zombies. Agent Sympathy 
(Piper Perabo of the upcoming "Coyote Ugly") is sent out to find Rocky and 
Bullwinkle and bring them into the real world, so they can stop Boris, 
Natasha and Fearless Leader.
Agent Sympathy brings the two to the real world, but she has to tell them 
what exactly is going on, while they try to adapt to the fact that there is 
no commercial breaks, and that the people around them are nicely animated. Of 
course the bad Boris and Natasha continue their raid to try to kill Moose and 
Squirrel. Agent Sympathy as to try to stop these two, while trying to get 
Rocky and Bullwinkle to understand that if they don't stop Fearless Leader in 
time, the world will come to an end. 
The movie is outlined by very funny, often hilarious moments that I enjoyed 
enormously. The movie works on many levels and tanks of many levels. The 
levels it works on is that the actors who are portraying their characters are 
fantastic. Rene Russo is the stand out as Natasha Fatale the sexy french 
woman who with her honey Boris Badenov played well by Jason Alexander try to 
get Moose and Squirrel but as usual fail miserably. Jason Alexander is a 
great choice for Boris but sadly he isn't given enough to do, and at times 
seems a bit dull in the role. Robert De Niro is great as  Fearless Leader 
with his accent and high-pitched voice. Perhaps the best performance comes 
from newcomer Piper Perabo who is a talented and beautiful actress capable of 
many things in her future. There are some great cameos by stars like Whoopi 
Goldberg, John Goodman, Jeaneane Garofalo and many more. 
Another plus to the film is the script which is cleverly written if at times 
a bit cliched. Rocky and Bullwinkle are greatly brought out and Bullwinkle is 
given some fantastic lines. The animation of these two are magnificent and 
plus in color and detail. They are brought out in a 3-D type of thing that is 
so great it might have surpassed Roger Rabbit's mix of Live Action and 
Animation, just fantastic and seeing the movie you can tell where the 
80+million budget came from. There are quite a bit of downsides to the film 
however, it seems really cartoonish and even sometimes dumb. There are some 
scenes that are really ridiculous and not even that funny.
I noticed that in a few scenes the cast seemed tired and the same joke was 
told over and over. But even with these flaws I was disappointed with the 
whole movie entirely, but the animation, characters and some of the insights 
of the film are enjoyable, and kids will definately love it. Its a good movie 
overall with flaws but far from being bad, but far from being perfect.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring July 11, 2000
Visit Mov
ie Review Central

Title
Review for Monkeybone (2001)
Monkeybone   *1/2 out of * * * *
Starring: Brendan Fraser, Bridget Fonda, Chris Kattan, Rose McGowan, Megan 
Mullally, voice of John Turturro.
Directed by: Henry Selick
Running Time: 90 minutes
Rated PG-13: crude humor and brief nudity.
"From the director of "The Nightmare Before Christmas" it said in the 
previews, which I'm guessing was said to get people to go see the movie, 
obviously it hasn't worked since the $75 million dollar movie has yet to 
break $5 million. To each it's own however, since "Monkey Bone" is not only a 
bad movie all together, but technically well-made. A tragic waste of talent 
and incredible visual effects.
Stu Miley is the genius behind the new phenomena "Monkey Bone" a crude comic 
strip, that everyone wants to merchandise, they go to great links to get it 
as well, including dollars that let out fart powder. When Stu and his 
girlfriend, Julie (Bridget Fonda) are in a freak car accident (you'll see) 
Stu goes into a coma, and while in his coma Stu travels to I'm guessing Dark 
Town, where all the characters in dreams come to life. People are stuck in 
this town, with their nightmares roaming around them. When Stu spots Monkey 
Bone (whom he really can't stand) he tries to keep him under control. Making 
a new friend Kitty (Rose McGowan) he learns that if he gets an exit pass from 
Death, he can go back up and live his life. When Monkey Bone and Stu steal a 
pass, Monkey Bone becomes a trader and takes it and goes into Stu's body. Now 
Monkey Bone must get everyone to buy these dolls with nightmare powder, so 
everyone has nightmares...or something like that.
Rather complex (in fact more than it needs to be) "Monkey Bone" had potential 
in the script and even the story. What is considerably noticeable is the 
gaping plot holes, and lack of character development. For instance we really 
don't get to know who Stu or Julie are, so why should we even care? Kitty 
played well by Rose McGowan ha a story behind her, but we are not given a 
chance to know her. 
The cast is decent however, Brendan Fraser seems to be enjoying himself in 
the role as Stu Miley, but becomes awfully annoying when Monkey Bone takes 
over his body. Bridget Fonda is dreary and seems to bring the film to a 
screeching halt, her performance is bad and she seems miscast. Dave Foley 
isn't given enough to do, as well as "Will & Grace's" Megan Mullally who can 
be funny. The standout performance is the voice of Nick Turturro as Monkey 
Bone himself, he is very funny and entertaining and really keeps the film 
from being a total bust. 
The special effects of "Monkey Bone" is what might really bring in some 
curious viewers, these special effects are highly effective, and nice to look 
at with the eyes. Some of them are believable and some unbelievable...for 
Monkey Bone he seems to be like Stuart Little, you really don't realize that 
he is animated...but on occasion it sneaks up on you. The direction by Henry 
Selick is good, but at times he doesn't know what kind of film he wants to 
make, and the ending climax falls off the cliff. 
It's too bad really, "Monkey Bone" could have been a real good movie, but 
with it's heavily done hack job, and lack of character development it just 
sinks when the end credits role. For those curious however, it might be worth 
the rental, but other than that avoid this one.

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
Rated PG-13: sexual and crude humor, language, some nudity.
Starring: David Arquette, Scott Caan, Rose McGowan and a slew of WCW wrestlers.
Directed by: Brian Robbins
Well lets see...I'm not quite sure how to review this film, based on its
laughter factor. Well yeah I can, it's not funny. Ok so I laughed one time
which warranted the 1/2 star, but other than that I sat in my seat wondering
when this POS would be over, (which at a running time of 107 minutes seemed
like forever!). In fact, this could be the un-funniest movie I've seen in a
long time, if not the un-funniest. Let me be the first to say "Ready to Rumble"
is a huge disappointment.
Long time wrestling lovers (David and Scott) dream of making it to the WCW, and
watching Jimmy King wrestle. That is their hero of course, whom is kicked out
of the WCW. Well here is where the plot thickens (lol): the two wish to rescue
The King, and put him back into the WCW but not that easily, because they are
being tampered with by many people who are out to get them, while David's
father wants him to become a police officer, and Scott is a loser who has to
with the help of David clean out Johnny On the Spots. What a plot eh?
"Ready to Rumble" is one of those films that tries to be funny, but sadly fails
miserably, everything in the film is imcomprehinsable, and even the trailer
wasn't funny. The actors are dull, the script awful, and the plot which there
isn't much of....really annoying. I'm not quite sure how great actors like
these, and very funny actors too, are given such a lame script, and directed in
such a childish manner, that I wonder if Hollywood is ever gonna make good
films these days.
This review isn't going to be very long because of the fact that there isn't
much going for the film, if anything at all. Only one big laugh is in the film,
which isn't all that hilarious. I sat in my chair wondering with this 107
(!!!!!) minute "comedy" was going to be over, and sadly it went on forever. I'm
not sure if anything could have saved this film from being such a total waste,
but believe me you, it is.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 4/29/00
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Pokémon 3: The Movie (2001)
"Pokemon 3: The Movie" has a lot of bad things in it. First of all it's a 
plot heavy mess that has bad voice talents, badly written script and 
fantastic animation. The first film came out the end of 1999 and was a huge 
hit grossing almost $90 million domestically. A sequel soon followed and even 
made $45 million. Warner has released their third movie based on the 
immensely popular video game and TV series and its a waste of time and 
celluloid.
This time Ash Ketchum and his friends are on their way to the Johto battles 
(which my little brother told me the new spinoff is "Pokemon: The Johto 
Journeys" so go figure) anyway he comes in contact with a young girl who's 
father has disappeared after trying to discover The Unown. They are small 
Pokemon with a powerful punch and have great psychic abilities. The Unown 
bring together their psychic abilities and create Entei a powerful legendary 
Pokemon who barriers young Molly's house and creates every wish she wants.
Now it's up to Ash and his friends to stop this Pokemon Entei and show him to 
be a good Pokemon rather than a bad one. Too bad really that this is a bad 
movie, surprisingly the first movie was entertaining and somewhat absorbing, 
the second was a piece of trash and this one is almost in between. It has 
some good qualities (animation, message in the end) but the flaws seem to 
overpower the goods.
I'm still not sure what the big thing is about Pokemon, they are ugly little 
animals who speak their own name for their language (besides Meowth, my 
personal favorite) and you don't understand what they are saying. My little 
brother just thought the movie was amazing, and I kept leaning over and 
asking him happened, or what Pokemon that was. His response was a big lecture 
of how this is that, and that is this...he sure did put me in my place. 
With the second and third movie being bad, I have a feeling Pokemon 4: The 
Movie might be a total bust as well. "Pokemon 3: The Movie" has some 
redeeming qualities for the kids, and the Pokemon fans will dig every minute 
of this film. For those parents and/or brothers and sisters who have to sit 
through this...bring a pillow.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 4/11/01
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Brandon+Herring

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Rated PG-13 for some horror violence.
Starring: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lily Taylor.
This version of the classic 1963 movie of the same name is messed up. The
original was based on the terrifyingly creepy novel by Shirly Jackson entitled
'The Haunting of Hill House'. The 1963 version scared the wits out of me, even
at my age of 15. It takes your imagination on a ride, and does not show
anything. No ghosts, no monsters, no violence, nor no gore. It is a genuinely
scary movie, that stands as a classic to me. 
Now comes the 1999 version. Which supposedly had a 90 million dollar budget. I
can see why with the creepy set, scary effects etc. But what it doesn't have
that the first one did, is the terror. Don't get me wrong, this version has
it's moments, and I did jump many times. But the writers of this movie, totally
trashed it and messed it up. Especially the ending, I mean come what's going on
there? That never happened in the original movie.
Liam Neeson plays a doctor who is performing a study for people who cannot
sleep. He chooses three people: Eleanor  a timid young woman (Lily Taylor),
Theodora a sexy woman (Catherine-Zeta Jones), and Luke (Owen Wilson). He
invites them to an old house by the name of Hill House. Which was built by old
Hugh Crane. He tells them it is a test, to see how they sleep at night. But as
they begin to see things aren't so easy.
First while Nell (Elanor) is sleeping, she hears bangs and thumps. She and Theo
(Theodora) feel cold, while their door is almost being broke down by something
mysterious. And the fact is, what we don't see is what scares us the most. Soon
Nell starts hearing child's voices, and learns the owner of Hill House Hugh
Crane, was once married, and took children from his mill to his house and
killed them. She hears their voices, 'Eleanor, Eleanor help us please, help
us'. 'Follw us Eleanor'. She realizes, the house is trying to tell her
something.
But the other people in the house do not believe her and thinks she is just
going crazy. But after a while, they realize the house is the problem. Not them
but the house. Now first of all allll the stuff happens to Nell. Which like the
original it happened. Then the others start to figure it out, and they see
stuff move and hear ghosts. Unlike the original, the first had no ghosts to
see, had no special effects, or nothing. It made you imagine what it was which
is the scariest thing. 
Now though I did like the special effects, after awhile I got tired of em. I
wanted to see some scary stuff, I wanted to be scared. Sadly I wasn't as scared
as the first made me. Especially the ending, which let me down completely. The
acting though not first-rate was good, especially from Catherine Zeta-Jones and
Lily Taylor. The set however, saved the film from being a total washout. It
seemed as though you were there, the set was alive, and it seemed real een
though it wasn't.
So bottom line: If you loved the original, and you want this to be just as
good, wait for video. Special effects are good, but overdone, acting ok, scares
are there but not adundant enough. Go see 'The Blair Witch Project' instead,
which is the best horror movie ever made. And I can't wait to see it again.
'The Haunting '99' isn't the worst horror movie made, though the climatic
scenes leaves the audience in a state of confusion, and wondering 'What the
hell just happened?'
Reviewed: August 2, 1999 by Brandon Herring.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
WARNING: I dont usually like to give the plot that much away, but in this 
case, the ending has to be given away since most have already heard about 
what happens.
Rated R: strong violence, a graphic brutal rape scene, nudity, strong 
sexuality, language, drug use.
Starring: Hilary Swank, Chloe Sevingy, Peter Sarsgaard, Brenden Sexton III, 
Allison Folland, Alison Goranson, Matt McGrath, Rob Campbell, Jeanette 
Arnette.
"Boys Don't Cry" is a phenomenal story of courage, hope and ultimately 
tragedy. It was Teena Brandon, whom was known to her friends as Brandon 
Teena, a guy, who tragically died in 1993. This film follows Brandon from the 
first time he got his hair cut, to the last seconds of his life. It develops 
relationships between his friends, his enemies, and his love (Chloe Sevingy). 
The film is nothing short of astonishing, and after it was over, I sat in my 
chair, wanting to view the film again.
The movie as said before, follows Teena Brandon, a resident of Lincoln, 
Nebraska, as she makes the transformation into Brandon Teena, a smalltown boy 
who goes to Texas looking for some fun. While in a bar he meets a young woman 
named Candace (Alicia Goranson) whos family/friends start to latch onto to 
Brandon, and they all become the best of friends. Brandon meets Lana (Chloe 
Sevingy) who he instantly falls in love with. His buddies Tom and John 
(Brendan Sexton III and Peter Sarsgaard) are good with him, until they find 
out that Brandon is actually a woman. What once was a beautiful relationship, 
turns into an ugly fight for Brandon's life, for now since he is out as a 
she, they end up brutally raping her.
Before all this tragedy happened however, Brandon lives a happy life with his 
friends, and with Lana. The love of his life, whom he has an affair with, 
even though being a girl. He watched over her, cared for her and loved her. 
They wanted to be together forever, but Teena's life was cut short when she 
was only 21 years old. Tom and John after raping and murdering Teena, went on 
trial and are now facing the death penalty and life in jail, in the process 
they also murdered two more people including a young child.
The film is based on the a true story, and is that of a heartbreaking one. 
This movie like 1997's "Selena" even though knowing what happens in the end, 
you dread it. Brandon Teena was not a bad person, she was just confused. She 
had a disorder known as Sexual Identity Crisis, and didn't know any better. 
Hilary Swank brilliantly brings Teena back to life on the big screen, she is 
an amazing actress that in my opinion gives the best performance I have ever 
seen. She is realistic and tuff in her role to transform from a beautiful 
woman she is, to the man she protrays. Her performance is both insightful and 
brilliant.
The supporting cast is almost like a main character as well, since most of 
them share the same amount of screen time as everyone else does. The guys we 
latch onto then hate later, John and Tom are played fantastically by Brendan 
Sexton III and Peter Sarsgaard. They bring both of their characters out, and 
we feel as if we know the real guys just in the movie itself. Becky off 
"Roseanne" herself Alicia Goranson gives a great, mild performance, and seems 
to know who her character is and relates and brings the best out of her. 
Lana's mom played Jeanette Arnette is wonderfully over the top, but not over 
enough to become too trite, she brings all the good and bad things out in her 
character and perhaps the best supporting actress is Chloe Sevingy who is 
beautifully plays the character of Lana. She is so realistic, and so 
convicing as the character, that you start to actually see the whole film 
through her eyes, and how she saw Teena.
Kimberly Pierce wrote and directed this movie, that exceeds words of how good 
it really is. Its a heartbreaking, emotionally powerful, devistating, sad, 
moving film that has never has a film had such an emotional impact on me, 
that once it was over I actually interacted with who I am, and not who 
everyone wants me to be, or who I should be. The film convinces the audience 
by showing how brave of a man/woman Teena really was, and how she will 
influence people all over the world. If you feel like you are someone else, 
or need improvements upon yourself don't. See this movie and you will 
understand how much you can give up by trying to be the person you aren't.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 5/27/00.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Voices....Tim Allen, Tom Hanks, Joan Cusack, Don Rickles, Wallace Shawn, John
Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, Kelsie Grammar, Estelle Harris, Wayne Knight, Laurie
Metcalf, John Morris.
In 1995 a 30m dollar Disney CGI animated movie came out, and blew away
movie-goers everywhere. That little movie became a huge movie which grossed
little less than 200m, that movie was "Toy Story". Now four years later, Disney
blesses us with another adventure of the toys in Andy's room. This time around
the budget is three times as big and the adventure is twice as it was before.
Of course we all fell in love with the toys in the first; Woody the cowboy,
Buzz the spaceman, Rex the dinosaur, Slinky the slinkydog , Mr. Potato Head,
and Ham the piggy bank. Well in "Toy Story 2" all the toys return and are
delightful as ever that puts a smile on our face and makes our stomachs hurt
from laughing so hard.
"Toy Story 2" starts out with Buzz fighting Zurg, the evil emperor of course we
then see Rex playing the video game, and Buzz trying to give him tips to win.
We are then in Andy's room a regular boy with high hopes and lots of toys.
Woody (Voiced by Tim Allen) is Andy's favorite toy whom Andy plays with the
most. Of course he plays with his other toys, Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen), Rex
(Wallace Shawn), Slinkydog (Jim Varney) , Mr. Potato Head (Don Rickles) and Ham
(John Ratzenberger). Woody is prepared to go to cowboy camp with Andy but
before they get ready to go, Andy accidentally rips Woody's arm and Andy's mom
(Laurie Metcalf) puts him on the shelve to all the toys dismay. Woody realizes
that he is now shelved and will never be seen again. Meanwhile Andy's mom is
having a yard sale and selling old toys, Woody finds one of the toys they
thought they would never find again and tries to rescue him from the box. He
jumps in and gets him to the house thanks to the help from Buster the dog, but
Woody falls and is picked up by Al (Wayne Knight). Andy's mom tells him that
Woody is not for sale, but he steals him and takes him to his house.
There Woody meets three other toys, Jesse (Joan Cusack) a cowgirl, Bullseye a
very shy and funny horse and The Prospector (Kelsey Grammar). They tell Woody
that the reason he was kidnapped was because he was part of an old black and
white TV show to which would make him worth a lot of moolah today. If Al has
the whole set he could sell them and make a lot of money. The other toys come
to Woody's rescue and try and get him back to Andy before Andy gets home, but
realize Woody may not want to come home, leading to a finale that leaves you
breathless both because of the amazing eye candy and because of the amazing DTS
(Digital Surround Sound). 
I would have to definitely say that "Toy Story 2" may have surpassed it's
predessecor in many ways: Its three times as funny, had more adventure, a great
plotline and new great characters. Don't get me wrong though, I thought the
first was a terrific movie, but in that rare sequel thing "Toy Story 2" may be
better. This time around you knew everything about the characters therefore
they went right into the plot in the first fifteen minutes. There was never a
dull moment, a dumb moment or a slow moment. The movie constantly went on and
really never stopped. At times I laughed so hard that my side and stomach were
killing me. The animations was terrific and actually almost looked better than
the original. This time we have a lot more people and a lot more toys.
Some of the greatest moments include Woody trying to get his arm, Buzz and the
toys trying to get across the street, and Buzz and the toys visiting the Barbie
section. In fact every sequence in this movie was great. I think also that kids
and adults alike will love this movie. There is nothing offensive and it's very
good-natured with a few embedded messages to kids. There is of course like the
first humor that will hit kids hard, and humor that will fly over the kids
heads. Parents however will not dislike or find this humor anyway offensive.
It is safe to say "Toy Story 2" is Disney's newest masterpiece and offers to
much stuff in 83 minutes, that this review cannot even begin to tell how good
it is. The thing you have to do is see it yourself. One thing is if you haven't
seen the original I wouldn't suggest seeing this because of the fact that there
is a lot of stuff going back to the first, as well as some homages to classic
films such as "Star Wars" and "Jurassic Park". From the opening titles to the
end titles everyone in the theatre I was with was having a good time and we all
walked out of there with a huge smile on our faces with our sides hurting.
The thing "Toy Story 2" proves is that like "The Lion King 2: Simba's Price"
Disney can make sequels that are just as good if not better than the originals.
Unlike "Return of Jafar" and "Aladdin and The King of Thieves" "Toy Story 2" is
a smart, clever, hilarious and fun-filled animated movie that may be the best
since "The Little Mermaid". In other words "Toy Story 2" is outstanding,
fantastic, incredible, awesome and an instant classic. Cheers to Disney and
lets hope "Toy Story 3" isn't that far away.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring   November 22, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Title
Review for Down to Earth (2001)

Down To Earth  * *1/2 out of * * * *
Starring: Chris Rock, Regina King, Eugene Levy, Chazz Palminteri, Frankie 
Faison, Mark Addy, Jennifer Coolige, Greg Germann.
Directed by: Paul and Chris Weitz
Running Time: 87 Minutes
Rated PG-13: sexual humor, language.
Good natured comedies are sometimes a rarity. Most comedies out in the past 
year have either been raunchy (Road Trip), Stupid (Dude, Where's My Car), or 
just plain bad (Urban Legends: Final Cut...wait that wasn't a comedy). Its 
nice to know that some filmmakers out there still make these good natured 
comedies, and Chris Rock's new vehicle "Down to Earth" is one of them. It's 
funny, but also at the same time has a sweet side to it, and in the end 
delivers a good message.
Lance Barton is a struggling comedian, he wants to be at the Apollo and 
perform his comedy and not be booed off the stage (his nickname to his 
friends is Booie). On his way home from a bad show, he is hit by a truck when 
he sees a beautiful girl while riding his bike. He arrives in Heaven just in 
time, of course not realizing what happened, he thinks he is dreaming. 
Convinced by Keyes (Eugene Levy) and King (Chazz Palminteri) that he is 
indeed not dreaming, he finds out that Keyes took him 42 years early. For the 
mistake they tell him he can go back to Earth in another person's body, and 
live their life. The body he chooses is a older man by the name of Charles 
Wellington.
Wellington the 15th richest man in the world, is having a problem however, 
his wife is cheating on him, and his wife and her love (his personal 
secretary) just tried to kill him. To add to the muck, Charles has died and 
Lance has taken over his body. Now as Charles Wellington, Lance must fit in, 
in the world and try to convince the love of his life Sontee (a person very 
angry at him) that he is in fact someone else.
Many of the jokes in Down to Earth work, however some do not, and fall flat 
on their face at times as well. The acting is one of a mediocre scale, Chris 
Rock who I think is a better comedian than actor does a good job in the main 
role as Lance Barton, Regina King is sexy and realistic as the love interest, 
Eugene Levy and Chazz Palminteri make a great comedic duo as the angels. The 
standouts however are the maids and servant of Charles Wellington. Mark Addy 
of "The Full Monty" fame, does a great job playing his personal servant 
comedically named Cisco. Wanda Skyes plays Wanda, the loud mouthed but inside 
sweet maid is very funny.
Chris and Paul Weitz directed a little teen movie in 1999 that went on to 
make $102m domestically. That little film was "American Pie", and now two 
years later they are back, directing a comedy is hard to do, because you 
don't need any fancy camera shots, or special effects. "Down To Earth" really 
doesn't have any of these, but the direction however is good, the actors all 
do the right things, and the major flaws come from the story and the overall 
tone of the film. It doesn't seem as funny as one would want it to be, and 
story is at times pretentious.
Besides these flaws, "Down to Earth" is a clever little comedy, that is a 
remake of the Warren Beatty classic "Heaven Can Wait". In the end, its worth 
the watch, and worth sitting through its (too) short running time of only 87 
minutes, cramming in everything it can. 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 2/25/00.

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)

The Exorcist: The Version You've Never Seen  * * * * out of * * * *
Starring: Linda Blair, Ellen Burstyn, Jason Miller, Max Von Syndow, Kitty
Winn, Jack MCGovern.
Directed by: William Friedkin
Rated R: violence, gore, language, brief sexuality.
Running Time: 132 minutes
What is a scary movie anyhow? Is it a movie where a person gets ripped to
shreds? Is it where a person is being chased by some damned teenager who
wants revenge? Possibly its some guy with a hook who wants to know what you
did last summer. What ever happened to horror movies, where the horror was in
the atmosphere, and in the characters. Movies like "Halloween" and "Psycho"
which revolutionized horror genre forever, but wait in 1973 came a movie
based on the bestselling book by William Peter Blatty, entitled "The
Exorcist", the movie opened to rave reviews, and scared audiences to death,
now in the year 2000 "The Exorcist" comes back to the big screen in a version
you've never seen complete with six channel digital surround sound, and
fifteen minutes of new footage never before seen as long as a new ending.
Chris McNiell is an actress living in Georgetown Washington with her twelve
year old daughter Regan. While working on a new film, Chris still stays close
to Regan, but starts to wonder why her bed shakes at night, and why Regan
starts to have convulsions all of a sudden. When Chris finds out that Regan
is possessed by a demon, she shuns at the fact of it, but considers getting
a priest to help her daughter. Father Karras (Jason Miller) is the man they
bring in, his mother has just died, and still in mourning he decides to help
this little girl. Christ, Father Karras, and their nanny Sharon (Kitty Winn)
have to sit and wait until a man shows up, that man is the Exorcist, and that
man will help this little girl.
Excrutiatingly scary, The Exorcist is a classic horror film, which twenty
seven years later still scares audiences half to death. Now we get to the
experience "The Exorcist" the way it was meant to be seen in a director's cut
which incorpates fifteen minutes of new footage cut by Friedkin at the time
of the release for content and time, a new ending has been added as well, and
adds more of a lighter feeling to the movie, which I prefer the original
darker ending more. The movie has also been remastered in a wonderful Six
Channel Digital Sound mix, and is amazing. The voices are all clear, the
music pours out on you and engulfs you in richness.
As a director Friedkin has been well known for other films, but his standout
film is "The Exorcist" nominated for several Academy Awards it one a few, but
was somehow doubted Best Picture, Best Actress (Ellen Burstyn) and Best
Supporting Actress (Linda Blair) who at the age of I believe thirteen does a
wonderful job of being a little girl, alone, possessed and unable to stop
what is going on. Ellen Burstyn I think gives her best performance to date,
and can be seen currently in "Requiem for a Dream" to which she is getting
rave reviews for. Jason Miller (Jason Patrik's dad) is amazing as Father
Karras, and his performance will be forever embedded in my mind, to me he is
the character who makes the entire film float along.
I was saddened when I saw this film with an audience of mostly younger people
to see them laughing at this movie, I in no way, think that this movie is
comical, yes some of the stuff Regan says is funny, but they were laughing at
her head spinning, and the green pea soup, come on people this is some creepy
stuff! Anyway the re-release of the film has managed to make $40 million
dollars, and is still going. Hopefully one day they re-release it again in
twenty years for more generations to come to enjoy.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 10-10-00

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
Rated PG: sexual innuendo and humor, language, mild slapstick violence.
Starring: Mark Addy, Kirsten Johnston, Jane Krowkowski Stephen Baldwin, Alan
Cumming, Joan Collins, Voice of Rosie O' Donnell.
Running time: 90 minutes
In 1994, a family film opened with a 37.2 million dollar weekend, and went on
to gross a little under $140m. That film was based on a hugely popular cartoon
entitled "The Flintstones"...the movies name? The Flinstones. The huge hit
starred John Goodman as Fred Flintstone, Rick Moranis as Barney, Elizabeth
Perkins as Wilma and Rosie O'Donnel as Betty. The co-stars were Joan Collins,
Kyle McLachlan and Halle Berry. It was a very good family movie, with some
terrific acting and special effects. Now in 2000 we get the long-awaited sequel
"The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas", which isn't as good as the first movie.
Now the worst thing about the film is the actors: Mark Addy (an english guy) as
Fred Flintstone who was previously in the great film "The Full Monty" gives a
terrible performance as Fred. Stephen Baldwin (LOL) as Barney...is well
indescribably bad, but the two stars that shine in the lead roles is Kirsten
Johnston as Wilma, and Jane Krowkowski as Better. Kirsten who is in the NBC
show "3rd Rock From the Sun" plays Wilma very well, and brings her
characteristics out, as well as her character herself. Jane who is on the huge
show "Ally McBeal" is beautiful as Betty, and makes me wonder why Rosie
O'Donnell was picked to play Betty in the first film. She fits the character
greatly, looks like Betty, and acts like Betty. Mark Addy is a great actor, but
just doesn't have the capacities to play Fred Flintstone, he doesn't look like
Fred, act like Fred nor does he talk like Fred. Now for Stephen Baldwin,
although he looks like Barney, he doesn't have the mental capacity to play him,
because to me Barney is smarter.
Now for the plot of the movie: Years before Fred and Wilma meet, years before
Barney and Betty meet, Fred wishes for the person that is meant for him to be
out there, and Wilma wishes to go to Bedrock and out of her rich home. Wilma
leaves and meets Betty and moves in with her. They become best friends, as is
Fred and Barney. Fred and Barney meet Wilma and Betty at a Burger King type of
place, and they go on a double date, only to have several misadventures such as
Chip Rockefeller trying to woo Wilma to marry him and get rid of Fred, and a
little alien who is sent to Earth to study the human mating rituals. The story
is quite good, and tells alot about the Flintstones past, and is well
developed, like how Dino came along, how they got married, and how they lived.
The major flaw in this film is the cast though, we could have easily gotten a
better Fred and Barney, but Wilma and Betty are priceless, the great supporting
cast includes: Joan Collins as Wilma's mother, Thomas Gibson as Chip, and
several other cameos. The movie has some great sequences, and the special
effects are quite well developed, but it's missing the charm of the first film,
as well as the comedy. This one seems to be directed towards adults, and
contains some sexual humor that at times for a PG film is quite frank. It's not
a terrible film, but I could have wished for a better Flintstones movie, with a
much better cast.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 4/28/00
For more reviews please visit MOVIE REVIEW CENTRAL at
http://www.geocities.com/moviefan983/moviereviewcentral.html
